<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88518-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-18-88.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 96 / Wednesday, May 18, 1988 /Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52"> 46 CFR Parts 50, 52, 56, 58, 61, 62, 110, 111, 113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41"> [CGD 81-030]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Vital System Automation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Agency:</T2> Coast Guard, DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Action:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Coast Guard is adding regulations for automated vitalsystems on self-propelled commercial vessels to the Marine EngineeringRegulations contained in various subchapters of Title 46 of the Code ofFederal Regulations. Since the early 1960's, technological advances havecaused an ever-growing dependence on automation to provide for the safeoperation of vessels while reducing operating costs. Domestically, theCoast Guard has published a series of Navigation and Vessel InspectionCirculars (NVIC's) to promulgate its policy and guidance regarding thesafe design, testing, maintenance, and manning of automated vessels. Thesecirculars are inadequate and outdated. Internationally, the need for safeautomation on vessels has resulted in the inclusion of automation regulationsin the first set of amendments to the International Convention on the Safetyof Life at Sea, 1974 (SOLAS '74). These amendments entered into force internationallyon September 1, 1984. To ensure that safety is not compromised by automationor reduced manning, uniform safety regulations are needed to replace theNVIC's currently in effect, and to conform to and interpret the provisionsof the recent SOLAS amendments. The Coast Guard intends these rules toprovide minimum performance and testing standards that do not restrictuse of technological developments or alternative arrangements that providean equivalent degree of safety. Additionally, these rules detail the configurationand degree of automation the Coast Guard deems necessary when authorizationfor minimally attended or periodically unattended machinery plant operationis requested by the owner or operator of a vessel. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>This regulation is effective August 16, 1988. The Incorporationby Reference of certain publications listed in the regulations is approvedby the Director of the Federal Register as of August 16, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>A final regulatory evaluation has been prepared forthis rulemaking and may be inspected and copies at the Marine Safety Council(G-CMC/21) at Room 2110, U.S. Coast Guard, 2100 Second Street SW., Washington,DC 20593-0001, between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m., Monday throughFriday.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> LCDR Peter L. Randall, Officeof Marine Safety, Security and Environmental Protection, (202) 267-2206.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2> A notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM)was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on September 23, 1985 (50 FR 38608). Interestedpersons were requested to submit comments and fifty-two letters were received,each containing numerous comments. These comments are discussed in detailbelow.<ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information</ITAG>The principal persons involved in drafting this rulemaking are: LCDR PeterL. Randall, Project Manager, and Mr. W.R. Register, Project Counsel, Officeof the Chief Counsel.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Regulations</ITAG>a. Background(1) The vital machinery and engineering spaces of commercial vessels areautomated for a variety of reasons, including operator convenience, increasedefficiency, reduction or elimination of the need for operators to be continuouslypresent, and detection and control of unsafe conditions. Most automationis provided at the option of the owner of the vessel to reduce necessarymanning and increase operating efficiency, thereby reducing operating costs.Over the life of a vessel, the savings as a result of these reduced operatingcosts usually exceed the capital investment cost of the automation.(2) The Code of Federal Regulations does not address technical criteriafor the safe and reliable automation of vital systems on commercial vessels.For more than 20 years, the Coast Guard has issued a series of NVIC's toexpress its policy and provide guidance for the cognizant Officer in Charge.Marine Inspection in an effort to ensure a general level of safety on automatedvessels at least equal to that experienced on vessels that are not automated.The primary circular for self-propelled vessels other than small passengervessels and offshore supply vessels has been NVIC 1-69, ``Automated Mainand Auxiliary Machinery.'' This NVIC was issued in January 1969 as a resultof Coast Guard and industry experience with the automation technology andsteam propulsion systems prevalent in the 1960's. Worded as the ``judgmentof the Coast Guard'' in the context of 46 U.S.C. 222 (now 46 U.S.C. 8101),it provided guidelines for equipment design, maintenance, and testing.It also specified the equipment and procedures deemed necessary to qualifyfor reduced engineroom manning and emphasized that safety must not be compromisedas a result of either automation or associated reductions in manning. Whilemany of the underlying concepts of this NVIC have stood the test of timeand are consistent with the international views on safe and reliable automation,it lacks guidance and flexibility applicable to new technologies, configurations,and propulsion systems, particularly diesel engines and electronics. TheCoast Guard has used internal policy statements and interpretations toaddress these deficiencies. The existence of these numerous guidelinesand interpretations in nonregulatory form has at times caused confusionin the marine industry and resulted in nonuniform application, misinterpretation,and unnecessary additional costs to the industry.(3) In 1970, the United States submitted NVIC 1-69 the Inter-governmentalMaritime Consultative Organization (IMCO) for consideration in the developmentof international automation standards. (In 1982, IMCO changes its nameto International Maritime Organization, IMO.) In 1974, the United Statesparticipated in the development of the International Convention for theSafety of Life at Sea (SOLAS '74), which was developed under the auspicesof IMCO. SOLAS '74 was ratified by the United States on September 7, 1978,and entered into force internationally on May 25, 1980. The first set ofamendments to SOLAS '74, including automation regulations, were adoptedat the Forty-fifth session of the Maritime Safety Committee (MSC) of IMCOin November, 1981. Under the amendment procedures of SOLAS '74, the contractinggovernments, including the United States, accepted the amendments on March1, 1984. These amendments entered into force internationally on September1, 1984. The United States actively participated at all levels of developmentof the SOLAS '74 amendments and the document that comprised the automationrequirements, Resolution A.325(IX). Public comment was invited and themarine industry participated in all aspects of the development of the UnitedStates' position. The SOLAS '74 amendments are generally consistent withthe U.S. position; however, they require substantial interpretation andaugmentation by the Coast Guard and affected members of the public if theyare to be applied in a uniform and fair manner to the U.S. commercial fleet.(4) In 1981, the Coast Guard initiated this regulatory project, CGD 81-030,to update and replace NVIC 1-69, to incorporate IMCO Resolution A.325(IX),and to solicit public comment before publishing regulations. In 1983, difficultiesin evaluating foreign flag vessels being brought under the U.S. flag furtheraccentuated the need for revised Coast Guard automation requirements. NVIC6-84, ``Automated Main and Auxiliary Machinery, Interim Guidance On,''was published on June 25, 1984, to provide immediate interim guidance onthe application of the SOLAS amendments and NVIC 1-69 pending publicationof final rules in this rulemaking. Since its publication, NVIC 6-84 hasserved its purpose of clarifying how the Coast Guard intends to apply SOLASto U.S. flag vessels, informing the public, reinforcing certain generalconcepts found in both NVIC 1-69 and SOLAS, and de-emphasizing certainobsolete or conflicting guidelines in NVIC 1-69.(5) On September 23, 1985, the Coast Guard published the NPRM for thisrulemaking with a comment period set to close December 23, 1985. Shortlybefore the end of the comment period, however, requests for additionaltime to prepare and submit comments were received from the American Bureauof Shipping (ABS) and others. The requests cited the extensive and comprehensivenature of the proposed rule as the reason additional time was needed. Dueto the significance of this rulemaking, the Coast Guard considered it importantto allow parties with relevant comments additional time to evaluate theproposal. An extension of the comment period to February 21, 1986, waspublished in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>(51 FR 3352).Shortly before the end of the extended comment period, the National MarineEngineers' Beneficial Association (NMEBA) requested that a public hearingbe held on the proposed rules, citing perceived significant changes inCoast Guard technical and manning policies and the need for fullest possiblepublic participation. The Coast Guard carefully considered the points raisedin the request and noted that they reflected a misunderstanding of CoastGuard policy and the intent of the proposal. The Coast Guard also consideredthe extended length of the comment period, the public hearings on vesselmanning held in a related rulemaking discussed later in this preamble (Licensingof Maritime Personnel Rulemaking, CGD 81-059), and the written commentsreceived from the affected public, and concluded that a public hearingat that stage in the rulemaking was not necessary. All points raised inthe request, and the Coast Guard's detailed response, have been includedin the public docket and are addressed in detail elsewhere in this rulemaking.b. Issues Addressed.(1)<T3> Safety.</T3> The marine industry, the Coast Guard, and the membernations of IMO recognize that automated vital system failures are a hazardto navigation and personnel. Coast Guard records for casualties on U.S.flag vessels during 1985 and 1986 include at least 78 marine casualtiesinvolving automation addressed by this rulemaking, at a known total costof at least $3.2M in damages. These casualties are discussed at lengthin the Final Evaluation referenced above under ADDRESSES. As an example,Coast Guard casualty records include several cases where remote propulsioncontrols have failed, resulting in loss of control of the vessel and ensuingdamage. These propulsion control casualties alone have directly or indirectlyaccounted for $1.3M in damages in 1985 and 1986.(2) <T3>Vessel manning.</T3> Automation is a vessel manning issue as much asit is an issue of equipment safety and reliability. The Coast Guard ischarged by 46 U.S.C. 8101 with determining the complement of licensed officersand crew necessary for safe operation of a vessel. The Coast Guard recentlypublished revised manning requirements in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of October 16, 1987 (52 FR 38614) which includemanning provisions relating to vessel automation (see 46 CFR Part 15 entitled``Manning Requirements''). While these revised requirements in Part 15state that the degree of automation is considered by the Officer in Charge,Marine Inspection (OCMI) in determining the manning requirements for aparticular vessel, the technical criteria for making this determinationhas been in NVIC's 1-69 and 6-84, which are now considered by the marineindustry and the Coast Guard to be inadequate.(3) <T3>Lack of regulatory requirements.</T3> The reason most commonly citedby all interested parties as the need for automation regulations is thelack of clear regulations, and the inadequacy of NVIC's 1-69 and 6-84.Both construction costs and operating costs have been unnecessarily incurredby the marine industry because of misinterpretation of requirements.(4) <T3>SOLAS.</T3> The SOLAS amendments leave certain detailed requirementsand interpretations to the discretion or satisfaction of the ``Administration,''<T3>i.e.,</T3> the Coast Guard. Certain SOLAS provisions are also morestringent than previous requirements for U.S. flag vessels. An exampleof this is SOLAS Regulation II-1/31.2.7, which requires propulsion controlsystems to fail to a preset speed and direction. This SOLAS requirementexceeds past requirements and leaves interpretation of ``preset'' and thefailures to be considered to the individual Administrations.(5) <T3>Technological advances.</T3> The state of the art of marine automationhas advanced from steam plants and elementary controls and instrumentationto the diesel and hybrid plants, distributed automatic controls, and microprocessorcontrol and monitoring technologies prevalent today. This developmentaltrend is expected to continue and must be taken into account by automationregulations. (6) <T3>Safety evaluation complexity.</T3> The details of an automated machineryplant depend upon the design of the machinery, its arrangement, and theautomation technology (electronic, electric relay, pneumatic, hydraulic,mechanical, etc.) employed. The combination of these factors often makesthe details of an automation system unique to a given vessel or class ofvessels. The trend toward greater automation of vessels as a result ofeconomic pressure has resulted in large vessels with 1000-2000 monitoringpoints and sophisticated electrical plant management systems. This uniquenessand complexity in turn makes it difficult to evaluate the safety and reliabilityof automated vessels, and dictates the need for comprehensive performancestandards as opposed to detailed design requirements.(7) <T3>Applicability.</T3> SOLAS '74 and NVIC 1-69 were not developed to addresscertain systems or classes of vessels, such as mobile offshore drillingunits (MODU's), non-self propelled vessels, dynamically supported craft,or tanker overflow control systems. The applicability of standards derivedfrom SOLAS and the NVIC to these vessels must be given further consideration.These rules do not apply to those vessels.c. Intent of Rules.(1) <T3>General.</T3> The Coast Guard intends the regulations to_(i) provide flexible, performance-oriented rules to assure acceptable minimumlevels of safety, regardless of an automated vessel's degree of automation,the type of automation technology, or the configuration employed;(ii) assure compliance of automated U.S. flag vessels with the internationalstandards of safety promulgated by the SOLAS convention and the applicahbleIMO resolutions;(iii) emphasize the role of the marine industry, particularly in the areasof design, construction, and maintenance, in providing safe and reliablevessels; and (iv) closely integrate the specific automated vessel technical design andconstruction requirements of these rules with the vessel manning requirementsof recently revised 46 CFR Part 15, to assure the safety and adequate manningof U.S. flag vessels.(2) <T3>Structure.</T3> (i) The provision of a single set of automation regulationsapplicable to all vessels to which the Marine Engineering Regulations applyshould promote a uniform set of standards that can be more easily understoodand simplify the process of revising the regulations when necessary. Itshould also facilitate Coast Guard plans concerning possible future transferof certain functions associated with the regulations to the American Bureauof Shipping or other non-government agencies.(ii) The rules are broken into four major segments:(A) An equivalency provision.(B) General performance, reliability, and safety criteria for all automatedsystems.(C) Specific criteria for specific types of systems, where provided.(D) The minimum equipment and systems deemed necessary for minimally attendedand periodically unattended machinery spaces on automated vessels.Each of these segments is intended to build upon the prior, <T3>i.e.,</T3> systems listed under the specific provisions must also meetthe general criteria, and systems required for minimally attended or periodicallyunattended machinery space manning must also meet applicable specific andgeneral critiera.(3) <T3>Assumptions and objectives.</T3> (i) In developing the safety performancestandards in this rulemaking, the Coast Guard used several assumptionsand basic objectives. These were derived from the Coast Guard's experiencewith automated vessels over the last 20 or more years and from input providedby the public. They are considered to be fundamental concepts that, invarious degrees, are reflected in past and present Coast Guard, IMO/IMCO,SOLAS, and classification society policies and regulations for vessel safety.These basic assumptions were presented in the NPRM and are again listedbelow. Clarification of Assumption (B) has been made as a result of publiccomments, and the revision is shown in italics.<T3>Assumption (A)</T3> Regardless of how well designed, constructed, oroperated any automated equipment is, it can fail catastrophically. Whileextensive and detailed design, quality control, and maintenance regulationsmay reduce the likelihood of a failure, a finite probability remains thata failure can occur. Regulations that attempt to completely prevent failuremight in fact be counter-productive to safety, expensive, and burdensometo all parties. Therefore, it is prudent to assume that failures will occurand consider the necessary safety contingencies.<T3>Assumption (B)</T3> Localized flooding or fire can occur regardlessof the precautions taken to prevent them. Such emergencies can disablevital system automation, make it inaccessible, and pose an immediate threatto the safety of the vessel and its crew. Therefore, it is prudent to providealternative means of operation.<T3> Further, the ability to counteract localized flooding or fires shouldnot be diminished by the provision or location of automation.</T3><T3>Assumption (C)</T3> The evaluation of the safety of any automated vesselin light of the events described in Assumptions (A) and (B) should be limitedto any single, non-concurrent failure or event and its logical effects.In light of the large number of concurrent combinations possible and therelatively low probability of their occurrence, it is impractical and burdensometo consider such combinations. It is, however, prudent and reasonable toconsider the logical chain of events that could occur as a result of asingle failure or event, and to consider conditions that contribute tounsafe conditions.<T3>Assumption (D)</T3> The safety of vessels with automated vital systemsshould be at least equal to that of a vessel with its vital systems underdirect manual supervision.(ii) Based on these assumptions, these regulations are intended to meetthe following objectives:<T3>Objective (A) </T3>To the greatest extent practicable, the failureof automation or automated equipment should be safe (failsafe) and theforeseeable unsafe effects minimized by design. In a similar manner, theeffects of a localized fire or flooding on safe control and operation shouldbe minimized and localized.<T3>Objective (B)</T3> A responsible member of the crew must promptly becomeaware of a failure, fire, or flooding, either directly from personal observationor indirectly from reliable instrumentation or alarms.<T3>Objective (C)</T3> Upon becoming aware of a failure, fire, or flooding,the crew must have an alternate, effective means available to operate thevessel safely and to counteract the effects of failure, fire, or flooding.<T3>Objective (D)</T3> The crew should know how to operate both the automatedsystem and the alternate controls in the event the automation fails. Similarly,the operation of the system must be clear and obvious to the crew.<T3>Objective (E)</T3> There must be indication at operator control locationsof the safe, or unsafe, state of operation of the equipment controlledfrom that location.(iii) A failure scenario was developed that describes the intended sequenceof events deemed desirable to attain the primary goal of this rulemaking,safety. The scenario includes options that depend upon the nature of theautomation, manning of the vessel, and its operation. It is a developmentupon the aforementioned assumptions and objectives, and includes the followingsequence of events:<T3>Event (A)</T3> The vessel is underway in normal operation, with spacesand machinery status monitored by crewmembers or automation.<T3>Event (B) </T3>A single vital system or vital system component fails,or localized fire or flooding occurs.<T3>Event (C)</T3> In the case of a vital system failure, it fails to apre-determined safe state and the effects of the failure are minimized.<T3>Event (D)</T3> A crewmember on duty promptly becomes aware of the failure,fire, or flooding.<T3>Event (E)</T3> In the case of a vital system failure, either_(i) the failed unit is automatically removed from service and replacedwith a reliable, effective backup; or(ii) a crewmember manually removes the failed unit from service and manuallytransfers to a reliable and effective alternate means of operation.In the case of localized fire or flooding, either_(i) The crew takes action locally to counteract the effects of the hazard,if the space and equipment are accessible and operable; or(ii) The crew takes action from an alternate, remote location to counteractthe effects of the hazard, if the space or equipment are not accessibleor operable.<T3>Event (F)</T3> The failure scenario ends with the vessel in continuedor restored safe operation, even if at a reduced operational capacity.<T3>(4) Discussion of Specific Regulations_andSection; 58.01-35 Main propulsionauxiliary machinery.</T3> This rule is an interpretation of SOLAS RegulationII-1/26 and provides general performance criteria not found elsewhere inthe Marine Engineering Regulations. It has been included because it isfundamental to compliance with the performance standards in Part 62. <T3>Subpart 61.40 Design Verification and Periodic Tests.</T3> These testsare intended to make sure that automated systems initially operate in asafe and reliable manner and continue to do so during the service lifeof the vessel. The tests are similar to those described in NVIC 1-69. TheDesign Verification Tests in andSection;61.40-1 are intended to be more detailedand intensive than the Periodic Safety Tests of andSection;61.40-6, in thatthey must confirm that all systems, when initially installed, functionas required by the performance standards of Part 62. Design VerificationTests are generally associated with yard trials and sea trials. Periodictests are intended to confirm the continued operation of major safety systemsand features annually. On vessels where the Coast Guard has accepted automatedsystems to replace specific personnel or reduce overall crew requirements,the periodic tests are also intended to determine, in part, the adequacyof the required planned maintenance program and the adequacy of the mainningwith which the vessel has operated.Section 62.01-5(d) Applicability, Central Control Rooms.This paragraph is an interpretation of the SOLAS requirements referencedin Table I and is generally more stringent than past Coast Guard guidelines.Implicit in this interpretation is the assumption that a control room partiallyor completely isolates the operator from the machinery space environment.Certain essential monitoring and control functions, therefore, are requiredto be extended from the machinery space to the control room to providea level of safety equivalent to that of an operator located in the machineryspace itself.<T3>Subpart 62.20 Plan Submittal.</T3> This subpart contains certain changesfrom past standards. Significant among these are a new requirement fora qualitative failure analysis of certain complex automated systems, deletionof the previous requirement for a maintenance program <T3>approved</T3> by the Coast Guard, and provisions for the self-certificationof compliance with environmental design standards in lieu of plan reviewand laboratory testing.Section 62.20-1 Plans for Approval. The plan submittal requirements inthis section are similar to those of the past. Designers and manufacturersof automation equipment should also see 46 CFR 50.20-15, which outlinesthe requirements for the use of previously approved plans. Informationnecessary to confirm general compliance with the Marine Engineering andElectrical Regulations will continue to be required by those regulations,such as overcurrent protection, wiring and connection materials, and fluidpiping.Section 62.20-3 Plans for Information. The <T3>approval</T3> of a planned maintenance program is no longer a prerequisitefor reduced manning. The specific content of the program is up to the vessel'soperator. The maintenance program will initially be used by the Coast Guardto aid in evaluation of requests for reduced manning. Once the vessel isin service, it is intended that re-inspection and the Periodic Safety Testsof Subpart 61.40 witnessed by the Coast Guard will determine the adequacyof the maintenance program.This section also requires that a qualitive failure analysis be developedand submitted as an information document for certain complex systems. Thisdocument will aid in the evaluation of the system and will emphasize therole of the designer and manufacturer in evaluating the designed safetyof vital system automation. Further discussion of the failure analysisrequirements is included in the <T3>Analysis of Comments</T3> discussion below.<T3>Subpart 62.25 General Requirements for All Automated Vital Systems.</T3>This subpart is intended to provide general performance and arrangementstandards applicable to the control and monitoring of any vital shipboardsystem.Section 62.25-25 Programmable Systems and Devices. These requirements are intended to prevent either the intentional or unintentionalmodification of required safety parameters on systems or equipment thatreadily lend themselves to adjustment or loss of function, such as safetytrip sensors and programmable controllers. The requirements are not intendedto prohibit routine adjustments and calibration necessary for the normaland efficient operation of automatic controls or instrumentation.Section 62.25-30 Environmental Design Standards. These standards generally correspond to those of international technicalbodies. Rather than require detailed and costly testing to these standardsin an effort to confirm component suitability, the Coast Guard intendsto emphasize the realiable and safe function of the overall system, testingafter installation, and manufacturer and designer certification of componentsuitability.<T4>Subpart 62.30 Realibility and Safety Criteria, All Automated VitalSystems.</T4> This subpart is intended to provide general performance standardsapplicable to any automated vital system.Section 62.30-1 Failsafe.The failsafe operation of vital systems has long been a Coast Guard policy.In some cases, such as failure of propulsion controls to a preset speedand direction, the failsafe state is internationally definable and recognizable.In other cases, such as a microprocessor based system, the complexity ornature of the system may preclude the statement of a single preferred failsafestate. It is the intent of this rule that each control and alarm systemfail in a manner consistent with the overall safety of the vessel and personnelin light of the assumptions and failure scenario discussed in this rulemaking.For certain complex systems and in equivalency determinations, the failureanalysis required by andSection; 62.20-3(b) is intended to aid in the identificationof a preferred failsafe state.Section 62.30-5 Independence.Independence of systems or equipment normally implies separate and discretecomponents in order to provide reliability. Complete duplication in thismanner is costly, may not be necessary, or may be impractical. As the termindependent is defined and used in these rules, however, common reliablecomponents could be used provided the performance criteria are met. Anexample is a system that provides for disconnection of a failed subsystemwhile allowing continued operation of the required function. This definitionis included to allow arrangements that do not provide complete duplicationbut do provide a level of safety and reliability equivalent to completeduplication.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.35 Requirements for Specific Types or Automated Vital Systems.This subpart augments the general performance and configuration requirementsof Subpart 62.25 and 62.30. It addresses safety criteria peculiar to specificsystems of equipment that might be automated on a vessel.</ITAG>Section 62.35-5(e)(3) Remote Propulsion Control System Details.This rule has special significance in that it requires failsafe propulsioncontrol operation. Failure of propulsion controls, particularly while manuevering,has caused numerous vessel casualties. This rule, in conjunction with thefailure analysis required by andSection; 62.20-3(b)(2), is intended to addressknown causes of propulsion control failures.Section 62.35-20 Oil-Fired Main BoilersThese rules include automatic safety trip controls for all main boilersto prevent major boiler failures, greater emphasis on boiler air flow toprevent explosive conditions, and prohibition of certain automatic functionsfollowing boiler safety shutdowns.<T3>Table 62.35-50 Minimum System Monitoring and Safety Control Requirementsfor Specific Systems. </T3>This table is intended to summarize in a singlelocation the minimum instrumentation, alarms and safety controls deemednecessary by the Coast Guard for specific types and categories of automatedequipment.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.50 Automated Self-propelled Vessel Manning. This subpartis intended to address the minimum systems, configurations, and maintenanceprograms necessary for the Coast Guard to accept automated systems to replacespecific personnel or to reduce overall crew requirements in accordancewith the new andSection; 15.715 of the manning requirements mentioned aboveunder <T3>Issues Addressed. </T3>The requirements of this subpart would be inaddition to the rest of the technical requirements of Part 62. The referencesto specific levels of manning and watchstanders in NVIC 1-69 have beendeleted, as they have resulted in misinterpretation and confusion. Theserules are intended to establish technical criteria to be used by the Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection in determining the manning requirements fora particular vessel. Actual manning may exceed the Coast Guard's minimumrequired complement and is usually subject to agreement between a vessel'slabor and management interests. Failure of automated equipment to performin accordance with the provisions of the rules could result in the CoastGuard adjusting the minimum complement of officers and crew.</ITAG>Section 62.50-20 Additional Requirements for Minimally Attended MachineryPlantsThese requirements are intended to address vessel machinery plants andspaces that are automated, but not to a degree where the plant could safelybe left unattended. Emphasis is placed on the centralized remote controland monitoring of the machinery plant and machinery spaces and the assumptionsand failure scenario discussed in this rulemaking. The cognizant Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI) may determine the need for more orless equipment depending on the vessel characteristics, route, or trade.For example, the personnel alarm may not be required if normal operationincludes two crewmembers continuously in attendance.Section 62.50-20(h) Maintenance ProgramWhere automation is provided to replace personnel or to reduce overallcrew requirements, there may be a greater need for planned maintenance.This occurs because of a potential reduction in the maintenance work force,an increase in the sophistication and quantity of equipment to be maintained,and the reliance of the crew upon the automated equipment. The Coast Guardtherefore considers it necessary to require automated vessels to have aplanned maintenance program. As the content of such a program varies withvessel type, trade, route, manning and similar factors, the rules leaveprogram content and implementation up to vessel management. The Coast Guardwill evaluate the actual effectiveness of the program during the trialperiod and re-inspections and will then determine the adequacy of the programand manning.Section 62.50-30 Additional Requirements for Periodically Unattended MachineryPlantsThese requirements are intended to address machinery plants and spacesthat are automated to the degree that they are self-regulating and self-monitoringand can safely be left periodically unattended. Emphasis is placed on providingsystems that act automatically until the crew can take action in the eventof a failure or emergency. As required by the Coast Guard in the past,the requirements for a periodically unattended machinery plant are in additionto those of a minimally attended machinery plant. This permits the crewto operate the plant directly should the arrangements for unattended operationsprove unsatisfactory, for whatever reason.Section 62.50-30(k) Continuity of Electrical PowerThis rule, in consideration of SOLAS II-1/53.2, which requires automaticstandby power for the main switchboard, and 46 CFR 112.05-3, which prohibitsautomatic feedback by the main-emergency bus-tie, no longer permits useof the emergency generator as the automatic standby source of electricalpower.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Comments and Changes Made</ITAG><T3>Need for Regulations. </T3>This rulemaking has presented a new andcomprehensive set of safety regulations for vital system automation. Fourcomments on the proposed rules opposed the development of any new regulations,and stated a definite preference for NVIC's or comparable guidelines. Thereasons given included: (1) the NVIC's are less rigid and less costly,(2) the maritime industry is in recession and cannot give the proposedrules the attention they deserve, and (3) there is no clear mandate, <T3>i.e., need for regulation. </T3>Twenty-nine comments supported thedevelopment of new regulations, with ten stating the rulemaking representsa marked improvement over the NVIC's, which should help eliminate confusionand which should be generally beneficial.These rules have been developed as performance standards to allow the maximumpossible flexibility in compliance consistent with safety. The costs relatedto these regulations are discussed under <T3>Evaluation and Certification. </T3>These rules, and the NVIC's andSOLAS regulations from which they are derived, have been developed withconsiderable public input over the last 25 years, and the public activelyparticipated in the development of the final rules. Because of the everpresent potential for casualties related to vital system automation, thesesafety regulations are considered to be essential.<T3>Delegations to Classification Societies. </T3>The draft regulatoryevaluation and the notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM), at 50 FR 38615,stated that the proposed rules could potentially result in a cost savingsto the Coast Guard as a result of further delegation of plan review andinspection functions to the American Bureau of Shipping (ABS). Automatedvital system functions are not presently delegated by the Coast Guard toany party. Although the NPRM did not propose any delegation of plan reviewand inspection functions to classification societies, four comments supportedsuch a delegation. Specific delegations to the ABS or any other classificationsociety are considered to be beyond the scope of these rules, and are beingaddressed in a separate rulemaking docket entitled ``Delegation of Authorityto United States Classification Societies'' (CGD 85-019).<T3>Clarifications. </T3>The final rules include various clarificationsto provisions proposed in the NRPM which have been made principally inresponse to recommendations of commenters. Many of the clarifications addressspecific recommendations that certain text be revised to remove unclearor confusing concepts as noted in specific comments. With one or two exceptions,these clarifications have not been individually discussed below as thereasons for the clarification become self evident simply by comparing thetext of the clarified rule with corresponding proposed rule text. Certainclarifications have also been made to make text consistent with the textof various substantive changes which are discussed below.Sections 52.01-10(a) and 62.35-20(a)(1) Main Boiler Safety TripsOne comment recommended deleting the requirement to have automatic safetytrips on manually fired main boilers because they are not required by SOLAS.This comment has not been adopted. Coast Guard casualty records show thatnumerous boiler casualties, particularly flarebacks, occur when boilersare manually fired and can be avoided by providing automatic safety trips.These same findings are supported by ANSI/NFPA 85D ``Standards for Preventionof Furnace Explosions In Fuel Oil-Fired Multiple Burner Boiler-Furnaces.''Automatic safety trips are considered essential and are normally providedon vessels as a matter of general industry practice.Section 56.50-80(i) Lubricating Oil SystemOne comment recommended that the requirement in the proposed rules to havean emergency supply of oil for all propulsion turbines only be appliedto steam turbines. This recommendation has been adopted. There was no intentto apply the requirement to propulsion machinery other than steam turbinesand associated high speed gearing. The shorter coast down period of dieselpropulsion machinery generally makes an emergency supply unnecessary.Section 58.01-35 Duplication of Auxiliary MachineryThis regulation requires duplication of auxiliary machinery vital to themain propulsion system. One comment stated that the regulation should specifywhich auxiliaries must be duplicated. Another comment requested clarificationregarding single propulsion boiler installations, piping, cabling, deadshipstarts, and the relation of this regulation to SOLAS II-1/26 and Subpart56.50 of Subchapter F. Specific requirements for most auxiliaries requiredto be duplicated are contained in Subparts 56.50 and 111.10 of Title 46,CFR. Specific requirements for piping and cabling are also in Subpart 56.50,Subpart 111.10, and in andSection; 111.60-9. This regulation is substantivelythe same as SOLAS Regulation II-1/26.3.Two comments recommended that the note to andSection; 58.01-35 concerningpartial reduction of normal propulsion capability refer to a reduced navigatingcapability (after propulsion auxiliary failure) of 7 knots or half speed,whichever is <T3>less</T3> (rather than <T3>greater, </T3>as proposed in the proposed rule). This recommendationhas been adopted. The proposed rule would have required slower vesselsto have unnecessary additional equipment which is not needed when proceedingat half speed. The note as revised is comparable to the various recognizedclassification society rules which generally specify 7 knots or less.One comment asked whether an automation feature of ``automatic slowdown''would comply with andSection; 58.01-35. Automatic slowdown upon loss of anauxiliary component is one means of compliance.Section 61.40-1(b) Test ResponsibilityThis regulation specifies that testing must be done by persons designatedby the owner. One comment recommended that a marine inspector, rather thanthe owner of a vessel, randomly select a crewmember to conduct the testingrequired by this section in order to evaluate crew familiarity with thevessel. This recommendation has not been adopted. The tests are intendedto evaluate the equipment, not the capabilities of the crew. The CoastGuard's role with regard to automation test procedures is not to superviseor participate in the tests, but rather to inspect and witness testingof the vessel according to an approved procedure.Section 61.40-3(a) Design Verification TestingThis rule requires design verification tests to be based on failure analysis,if required by andSection; 62.20-3(b), and other criteria. One comment statedthat it will be difficult to derive a design verification test procedurefrom a failure analysis, especially where a microprocessor or computercontrol system is concerned. Failure analysis is intended to evaluate thesafety and reliability of the design and readily lends itself to identifyingcritical safety features that should be confirmed by testing. As an example,the failure analysis may show that a power outage to one section of a microprocessoror computer control system should not affect the operation of the restof the system. This design feature is identified by the failure analysisand can then be confirmed by a one-time design verification test.Section 61.40-6(b) Periodic Safety TestsTwo comments recommended that the typical period between tests be one yearin lieu of at each inspection for certification (<T3>i.e., </T3>every two years). This recommendation has been adopted.The Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI) can specify test intervalslonger or shorter than one year, depending on the particulars of the vessel'soperation, maintenance program, and past performance of the automation.Normally, however, the interval between periodic safety tests witnessedby the Coast Guard has been one year.Section 62.01-5(a) Vessel Applicability_<T3>MODUs</T3>Several comments stated that the proposed rules should not be applied tomobile offshore drilling units (MODUs). The applicability of the rulesto MODUs was addressed as issue b.7. above and made reference to the OCEANRANGER casualty. As a result of this casualty, attention to MODU ballastsystems and ballast control systems has significantly increased. Substantialeffort has gone into developing international standards for these systemsat various meetings of the International Maritime Organization, IMO. Pendingthe anticipated completion of international standards in 1988, the CoastGuard will continue to treat MODU automation as a vital system on a case-by-casebasis. The requirements in this rulemaking (CGD 81-030) will not be appliedto MODU's at this time. Applicable requirements of this rulemaking andthe finalized IMO standards will be proposed for MODU's in Coast Guardrulemaking docket (CGD 83-071a) when the IMO standards become effective.<T3>OSV's. </T3>Several comments questioned whether the proposed ruleswould apply to Offshore Supply Vessels (OSV's). These rules do not applyto OSV's. Requirements for these vessels are addressed separately in NVIC1-78 and have been incorporated into proposed rules being prepared forOSV's in a separate rulemaking docket, (CGD 82-004). See the advance noticeof proposed rulemaking for planned OSV requirements, which was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of February 14, 1983 (48 FR 6636).<T3>Other Vessels. </T3>Two comments recommended limiting the applicabilityof these regulations to self-propelled vessels to which NVIC 1-69 and SOLASapply, and a third comment recommended limiting applicability to self-propelledvessels over 1600 gross tons, with provisions for type and locale of operation.As in the case of OSV's, these rules were never intended to apply to self-propelledvessels under 500 gross tons certificated under Subchapters D, I or U,or to certificated passenger vessels under 100 gross tons. A new subsection5(a) has been added to exclude the applicability of these regulations tothese types and sizes of vessels. These limits are the same as SOLAS andthe Coast Guard's application of NVIC 1-69 and NVIC 6-84. The recommended1600 gross ton cutoff was not adopted. This cutoff would exclude vesselssuch as coastal tankers, coastal freighters, dredges, passenger ferries,passenger cruise vessels, and research vessels, all of which commonly useautomation. There are approximately 130 such existing vessels above the100/500 gross ton cutoffs of these rules and below 1600 gross tons, andNVIC 1-69 has been applied to most of them.The limitations for type and locale of operation are inherent in the regulations.For example, if the only automation on a passenger ferry is remote propulsioncontrol, only those requirements relevant to remote propulsion controlwill apply. However, if sufficient automation is provided to reduce manning,the cognizant OCMI will determine the need for more or less equipment dependingon the vessel characteristics, route, or trade (see andSection; 62.50-1(b),note). This approach represents a continuation of current Coast Guard policy.One comment suggested that the proposal only apply to vessels that areautomated to reduce manning, but not to vessels that automate vital systems,as an option, without reduced manning. This recommendation has not beenadopted. Coast Guard casualty records show that automation can fail regardlessof a vessel's manning, and that adequate safety precautions must be taken.This is one of the fundamental points discussed under <T3>Assumptions and Objectives</T3> in this document. Additionally, SOLASRegulation II-1/31 also contains automation requirements for vessels thatautomate vital systems, as an option, without reduced manning.Section 62.01-5 (b) and (c) System and Equipment ApplicabilityThese rules apply to automated vital systems and equipment listed in andSection;62.01-5(b) except for certain exemptions listed in andSection; 62.01-5(c).One comment said this applicability is too broad and appears to includesimple systems for closing fuel valves, stopping ventilation, and automaticallystarting pumps. The comment recommended that the applicability be morespecific and, in particular, be limited to propulsion control systems.This recommendation has not been adopted. The basic safety principles discussedin <T3>Assumptions and Objectives </T3>have been applied by the Coast Guardin developing these rules and are intended to apply to simple and complexsystems alike. The proper location and failsafe operation of remote motorand valve controls, the provision of local manual alternate control, andthe automatic starting of standby vital auxiliaries in unattended machineryspaces are important safety considerations for automated vessels. Fireprotection systems, flooding safety systems, and electrical power generationsystems are among the systems that are automated and essential to safetythat would be excluded by adopting this recommendation.One comment said the regulations should not apply to systems that are onlybeing monitored and that are not automatically or remotely controlled.This recommendation has not been adopted. Instrumentation and alarms, fromsimple bilge level alarms to complex computerized video displays in controlrooms, are relied upon by the crew as extensions of their own senses andas a source of information for making decisions. Reliable and clear presentationof this information is necessary for safe operation of the vessel and itsmachinery.Proposed paragraph (b)(3) exempted optional control and monitoring systemsfrom all of the proposed requirements. One comment recommended that thisexemption be deleted, <T3>i.e., </T3>that the requirements in this rulemaking be made applicableto optional control and monitoring systems which can effect vital systems.This recommendation has been adopted. The final rules (see andSection; 62.01-5(b) and (c)) have been made applicable to optional control and monitoringsystems unless otherwise exempt as non-vital or industrial systems or othersystems exempted under andSection; 62.01-5(c). Non-vital exempt systems includeperformance monitoring and trending systems and similar non-required, non-vitalsystems whose failure would not degrade the safety and reliability of requiredsystems.Section 62.01-5(d) Central Control RoomsThis paragraph provides that the requirements of subpart 62.50 for automatedself-propelled vessel manning only apply to vessels automated to replacespecific personnel or to reduce overall crew requirements, with certainexceptions. The exceptions relate to vessels having main propulsion orships service electrical generating plants which are automatically or remotelycontrolled from a control room. In this case, vessels must provide certainadditional essential monitoring and control functions required in andSection;andSection;62.50-20(a)(3), (b)(3), (c), (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(4) and (f)(2), includingfire protection and flooding safety functions. As explained in the NPRM,this regulation was derived from SOLAS Regulations II-1/31.3 and assumesthat a control room partially or completely isolates the crew from themachinery space environment.One comment said that reference andSection; 62.50-20(a)(3)(ii) (relatingto control and monitoring of the electrical <T3>generating and distribution </T3>plant from the control room) shouldbe deleted. This recommendation has been partially adopted. The provisionin andSection; 62.50-20(a)(3)(ii) for control and monitoring of the electrical<T3>generating plant </T3>from the control room has been retained in thefinal rules. Situations arise where the licensed engineer in a controlroom, without these capabilities, would be effectively isolated from thecontrols and instrumentation needed to restore power in the event of ablackout. Control of the entire electrical distribution was not intended,however, and the final rules have been modified to provide that compliancewith the electrical distribution provision in andSection; 62.50-20(a)(3)(ii)is not required. Compliance is also not required in the comparable SOLASregulation, II-1/31.3, and the revision reflects contemporary industrypractice.The proposed rule included a reference to andSection; 62.50-20(d) (relatingto remote control of fire pumps). One comment recommended that this referencebe deleted because it unnecessarily exceeds SOLAS Regulations II-2/4.3.4.This recommendation has been adopted. The reference does exceed SOLAS andit refers only to vessels not having reduced manning, in which case sufficientcrewmembers should be available to quickly respond to the required firealarms regardless of the location of pump control.One comment recommended that the reference to the requirement in andSection;62.50-20(e)(2) for remote control of a required bilge pump from the controlroom be deleted because it exceeds SOLAS. This recommendation has not beenadopted. The intent of andSection; 62.01-5(d) and SOLAS II-1/31.3 and 48is to ensure the ability to take timely and effective action to counterflooding. Also the need for andSection; 62.01-5(d) is supported by casualtyinformation involving engineroom flooding. Remote control of a bilge pumpfrom the control room is essential to carry out <T3>this </T3>intent and, accordingly, the provision has been retainedin the final rule.To comments expressed uncertainty as to whether the requirements in thisparagraph apply to vessels with open control stations. These rules do notapply to vessels with open control stations where reduced manning is notdesired; nor do the rules require enclosed control rooms.Section 62.05-1 Incorporation by ReferenceThe proposed rules referenced the IEEE ``Guide for General Principles ofReliability Analysis of Nuclear Power Generating Station Protection Systems''as the primary standard for the development of failure analysis requiredby this part. Four comments recommended deleting this reference becauseit is not a commercial maritime standard, the commercial maritime industryis generally unfamiliar with it, and because it could be applied in a mannerthat would be overly restrictive and impose a prohibitively high cost.This recommendation has been adopted. Failure analysis, and acceptableformats for failure analysis, are discussed below under <T3>andSection; 62.20-3(b) Plans for Information, Failure Analysis.</T3>Three comments recommended comparing the proposed rules to those of theAmerican Bureau of Shipping, and whenever the ABS rules will suffice, adoptthem in lieu of the proposed rules. This recommendation has also been adopted,and the rules have been revised to incorporate by reference the ABS ``Rulesfor Building and Classing Steel Vessels'' where possible. More extensiveincorporation by reference of ABS rules in this rulemaking has not beenpossible because of differences in requirements, scope, and application.Two comments suggested that the Coast Guard work with the ABS to resolvedifferences and change ABS automation rules to facilitate additional incorporationsby reference. The Coast Guard is actively working with ABS, ASTM, SNAME,and others to develop industry automation standards and guidelines suitablefor future incorporation by reference.Section 62.10-1(a) and 62.30-1(a) Definitions, FailsafeTwo comments noted the absence of a definition of what is failsafe fora given system and wanted specific failsafe states specified by the CoastGuard, if possible. Section 62.30-1(a) requires the evaluation of failsafestates on a case-by-case basis. Case-by-case evaluation is necessary becausesystems and vessels vary, and what is safe for one may not be safe foranother. For example, shutdown of one of two propulsion engines on a vesseldue to overheating may be safe because propulsion can be maintained withoutjeopardizing the vessel or personnel. On a single propulsion engine vessel,however, the same shutdown would result in loss of propulsion and shouldnot be considered ``failsafe'' because a less critical alternative, <T3>e.g., </T3>a reduction in power without shutdown, may be possible andpreferable. Table 62.10-1(a) provides a listing of <T3>typical</T3> failsafe states for automated equipment specified in therules.One comment requested clarification of what is considered to be the failsafestate for remotely operated fuel tank valves. These valves should failclosed under fire conditions, but should fail open under other conditionsto permit continued operation of engines. Table 62.10-1(a) has been revisedto reference andSection; 56.50-60(d) which specifies these valves must eitherfail closed or have a stored energy system to close them.One comment said that some safety systems should be allowed to fail inan ``as is and alarm'' state rather than result in the shutdown of vitalmachinery. The table has been revised to include this option.Section 62.20-1(a) Plans for ApprovalOne comment asked if automation plans, test procedures, and failure analysiscan be submitted at any time for review and approval. Automation plansmust apply to a specific vessel, and must be submitted for review in accordancewith Subparts 50.20 and 62.20. However, andSection; 50.20-15(a) providesthat if a manufacturer wishes to fabricate equipment in accordance withplans previously approved, including work accomplished under a previouscontract, resubmittal of plans is not required if the equipment is certifiedto be identical, that there are no changes in the applicable regulations,and that the same Coast Guard plan review office, <T3>i.e., </T3>the Marine Safety Center, is the approving authority. TheCoast Guard will review previously approved plans to determine if theyare suitable for the specific vessel and system application. The industryis encouraged to take advantage of the provisions of andSection; 50.20-15(a)as they are both time and cost effective for the Coast Guard and industryalike. A manufacturer or shipyard planning to use previously approved plansshould contact the Marine Safety Center to discuss establishment of a designfile, how plan modifications and contract-specific details are to be treated,how information plans are to be treated, and similar details.Sections 62.20-3(a)(2), 62.50-20(h) and 62.50-30(j) Planned MaintenanceProgramThe final rules require a planned maintenance program on vessels automatedto replace specific personnel or to reduce overall crew requirements. Therules also require that this program be submitted to the OCMI as an informationdocument for use in evaluating automated vessels and the proposed manning.Two comments suggested that these requirements are unnecessary and recommendeddeleting them. These recommendations have not been adopted. Planned maintenanceprograms are necessary on these vessels because of a potential reductionin the maintenance work force, an increase in the sophistication and quantityof equipment that must be maintained, and the reliance of the crew on theautomated equipment. The Coast Guard has required and approved maintenanceprograms under the provisions of NVIC 1-69. Section 62.50-20(h)(1) statesthat program content and detail are optional, provided it includes thenecessary maintenance and repair manuals and checkoffs to help avoid errorsof omission. Sections 62.50-1(b)(4) and the new andSection; 15.715(a) ofthe recently adopted ``Manning Requirements'' state that Coast Guard acceptanceof automated systems to replace specific personnel or to reduce overallcrew requirements is predicated upon a planned maintenance program to ensurecontinued safe operation of the vessel. Maintenance programs vary fromprovision of scheduled shore-side maintenance personnel for vessels witha dedicated route, to the provision of a detailed program carried out bya reduced shipboard engineering complement. The Coast Guard considers thisinformation in evaluating automated vessel manning requests.Section 62.20-3(b) Plans for Information, Failure AnalysisThe proposed rules required submittal for approval of a qualitative, non-numericfailure analysis of <T3>all</T3> vital system automation. The proposed requirement for reviewand approval of a qualitative failure analysis of all automation was partof a multi-tiered safely scheme comprising failure analysis at the designstage, oversight of the analysis by the Coast Guard, review of safety requirementsfor overpressure, overcurrent, fire safety, shock, and similar materialcharacteristics, design verification testing to confirm the accuracy ofthe failure analysis, a shipboard trial period, and follow-up periodicsafety tests to confirm that the system continues to operate safely. Inmany respects, this scheme was more comprehensive than past criteria. Theproposed requirement represented an expansion of Coast Guard policy inrecent years of requiring a qualitative failure analysis for microprocessor-basedvital system automation because of the complexity of these systems. Itwas also comparable to the requirements of various classification societiessuch as the American Bureau of Shipping (ABS).Five comments opposed the use of qualitative failure analysis as the primarymeans to evaluate safe functioning and reliability of designs. The commentssuggested that potential abuses and a decrease in safety could result alongwith uncertainty among designers as to application of the regulations,and they emphasized that the proposal would unnecessarily add to the overallcosts of relatively uncomplicated systems on smaller vessels. In accordancewith these comments, proposed andSection; 62.20-1(a)(4) and andSection; 62.30-10,which required failure analysis approval for <T3>all </T3>vital system automation, have been deleted. However, the finalrules (andSection; 62.20-3(b)) retain a requirement for qualitative failureanalysis for certain complex systems and particularly vital safety features.As recommended by the comments, detailed automation piping and wiring planscurrently required by 46 CFR Subchapters F and J will continue to be required.Qualitative failure analysis is a relatively new concept for many in theindustry. Detailed plan review is adequate for simpler systems. The approachtaken by the final rules minimizes the financial impact on the industryby requiring qualitative failure analysis only in those cases involvingcomplex systems where experience shows that the analysis is necessary andthe industry is generally familiar with the concept. Qualitative failureanalysis will be used to <T3>assist</T3> in evaluating the safe functioning of complex systems representedby detailed piping and wiring plans. This approach is similar to the requirementfor stability calculations required by 46 CFR 170.090 (which aid in theevaluation of vessel stability) and is similar to the requirement for calculationof short circuit currents (fault current analysis) required by 46 CFR Subpart111.52 (which aids in the evaluation of vessel electrical systems). As discussed above, experience has shown that analysis is necessary forcertain complex systems. A brief discussion of the analysis requirementsin the final rule and why they were retained follows.(a) Section 62.20-3(b)(1) of the final rules requires a qualitative failureanalysis for propulsion controls. As discussed in the NPRM, Coast Guardcasualty records include several cases where these vital and often complexsystems have failed, resulting in loss of control of the vessel and ensuingdamage. Experience has shown that numerous casualties can be preventedby the use of failure analysis at the design stage to identify the designflaws that have resulted in many of these casualties.(b) Section 62.20-3(b)(2) of the final rules requires a qualitative failureanalysis of microprocessor based system hardware. This requirement hasbeen a policy of the Coast Guard since 1983. It is necessary because ofthe complexity of these systems and their tendency to fail in indeterminatemodes, making traditional evaluation by detailed plan review impracticaland ineffective.(c) Section 62.20-3(b)(3) of the final rules requires a qualitative failureanalysis of safety controls. This requirement is necessary to aid in theevaluation of the required reliability, functional independence, and failsafeoperation of these particularly important controls.(d) Section 62.20-3(b)(4) of the final rules requires a qualitative failureanalysis of electrical power management systems. Electrical power managementsystems have become increasingly complex in recent years in an effort toincrease vessel efficiency. This requirement is necessary to evaluate theeffect of electrical power management system failure on the continuityof ship service electrical power, the propulsion plant, and the overallreliability and safety of vessel systems that rely on electricity for power.(e) Section 62.20-3(b)(5) of the final rule requires a qualitative failureanalysis for automation equipment or functions that are required to beindependent but that are not physically separate. This requirement is necessaryto evaluate the safety of systems and equipment which share a common componentor components, such as a control actuator, data bus, or uninterruptablepower supply, but which must still be able to function independently inthe event of failure in one of the systems. The failure analysis will typicallyonly address the effect of failures to these common components on otherwisephysically separate systems or functions.(f) Section 62.20-3(b)(6) of the final rule requires a qualitative failureanalysis of any other vital system automation that, in the judgment ofthe Commandant, constitutes a safety hazard to the vessel or personnelin case of failure. This requirement is necessary to address the safetyand reliability of new or innovative automation designs or technologies,and to address automation that, as the result of future casualty experience,the Commandant considers particularly hazardous in the event of failure.Section 62.20-3(b) includes a note explaining the intent, level of detail,procedures and content necessary for the required failure analysis. Thenote states that analysis need only be to a level of detail necessary toshow compliance with the requirements of this rulemaking. One comment suggestedthat analysis should be conducted to a detailed component level in orderto be of value because it is at that level that failures occur. This recommendationhas not been adopted. The discussion in the NPRM said that it is not intendedthat the failure analysis be performed to the extremely detailed level.Normally, the level of analysis would be to the major subsystem or majorreplaceable component level, such as a remote control subsystem, powersupply, or actuator. Once the analysis identifies that required safetyprovisions are met, <T3>e.g., </T3>failsafe, functional independence, safety trips, operation,etc., additional analysis of the feature in greater detail is not neededto determine safe operation after failure.Section 62.20-5(a) Self-CertificationThe proposed rules required the designer and manufacturer of an automatedsystem to certify to the Coast Guard, in writing, that the system is designedto meet the environmental design standards of proposed andSection; 62.25-30.The proposal also stated that plan review and independent testing to showcompliance with the referenced standards was not necessary. Four commentssaid that self-certification is inadequate and recommended equipment testingto determine compliance with environmental design standards. This recommendationhas not been adopted. With few exceptions, self-propelled vessels are classedby a classification society, and their automation equipment is thereforetested to environmental design standards of the classification societyby the manufacturer. Additional environmental design testing by the manufacturerfor the Coast Guard would be unnecessary duplication of effort and cost,particularly considering the assumptions of this rulemaking concerningequipment failure and the requirements for failsafe operation, alternatecontrol, failure analysis, plan review, design verification testing, shipboardtrial periods and follow-up periodic safety tests. On the occasional unclassedvessel, the accountability of the designers, the manufacturers, the owner,and the operator should avoid abuses in the self-certification process.Section 62.25-1(b) Proposed Posted Operating InstructionsProposed andSection; 62.25-1(b) required operating instructions to be providedand emergency operating instructions to be posted at control stations whenthe operation is not common or readily apparent. Two comments said therequired posting of emergency operating instructions is unnecessary becausethey would have to be voluminous and superfluous and would clutter thecontrol station, would duplicate the technical manuals already requiredby andSection; 62.20-1(a)(8), and because the licensed engineers should normallybe aware of emergency procedures without reference to posted instructions.In accordance with these comments, proposed andSection; 62.25-1(b) has beendeleted. It should also be noted that Section 15.405 of the new manningrules requires each licensed engineer to become familiar with the relevantcharacteristics of the vessel, including emergency duties, controls, andmain propulsion and auxiliary machinery, prior to assuming his or her dutieson the vessel.Section 62.25-1(b) of the final rule provides that automation which controlsor monitors more than one safety control, interlock, or operating sequencemust perform all assigned tasks continuously, <T3>i.e., </T3>the detection of unsafe conditions must not prevent controlor monitoring of other conditions. Three comments said this requirementshould be revised to allow scanning type monitoring rather than continuousmonitoring. This recommendation has not been adopted. The rule is intendedto preclude systems that identify and process individual problems for anindeterminate length of time, to the exclusion of other, possible moreimportant, assigned responsibilities. Such operation is not equivalentto manual control and monitoring by the crew. Automated systems that repeatedlyscan inputs or conditions with sufficient speed to be equivalent to manualmonitoring, however, would be acceptable.Sections 62.25-5(a) and 62.35-5(d) Control LocationProposed andSection; 62.25-5(a) required control of propulsion systems, electricpower generation systems and electric power distribution systems to befrom only one location at a time, except for safety trips. One commentrecommended deleting reference to electric power generation systems andelectric power distribution systems because it would prevent pilothouseload and generator selection input to electric power management systemswhich are controlled in the engineroom with remote input from the pilothouse.This comment has been adopted in andSection; 62.35-5(d), and proposed andSection;62.25-5(a) has been deleted.Section 62.25-5(c) Control Systems, Inadvertent GroundingThe proposed rule said that inadvertent grounding of an electrical or electronicsafety control system must not cause false signals or safety control bypassing.One comment recommended that the use of self-monitoring circuits whichwould automatically alarm if there is a ground should be allowed as analternative. The recommendation has not been adopted. The intent of therule is to preclude, by design, unsafe effects of grounds on control systems.The proposed alternative would not normally be acceptable because it doesnot preclude these effects; it only alarms them.Section 62.25-20 Instrumentation, Alarms, and Centralized Control LocationsThe rules in this section are performance standards that provide performancecriteria for instrumentation and alarm displays. They do not provide specificrequirements for any particular instrumentation technology, <T3>e.g., </T3>analog gauge displays, digital displays, or cathode raytube (CRT) displays. Three comments recommended that specific requirementsfor CRT displays be added. Reasons cited included CRT susceptibility tosingle failures, their inability to continuously display information duringalarm conditions, and the limitations on the amount of information thatcan be displayed at one time. These recommendations have not been incorporatedin the final rules. CRT displays can provide the same performance capabilitiesas conventional console displays and both are considered to be acceptableas long as they meet the standards in these rules. Depending on their configuration,both can be susceptible to single failures that can eliminate most or allof their display capability and, accordingly, both are evaluated to determinethe effects of such failures. The limitation on the amount of informationthat can be displayed at one time by a CRT is comparable to the limitationon the amount of information that can be effectively observed at one timeon a large conventional console display, <T3>ie., </T3>the CRT screen display is comparable to the viewable portionof the conventional console. Also, both CRT's and conventional systemscan be configured to simultaneously display both alarm and system information,<T3>e.g., </T3>one CRT used to display only alarm conditions.Paragraph 62.25-20(b)(2) requires systems with remote instrumentation tohave provisions for the installation of instrumentation at the monitoredsystem equipment. Two comments asked whether this rule requires permanentlyinstalled instruments. The answer is no. This paragraph does not requireinstruments to be permanently installed and it is identical to a longstandingguideline in NVIC 1-69 that was intended to make sure instruments can beutilized at the equipment location if the remote monitoring system fails.Paragraph (b)(3) of the proposed rule required the status of automaticor remotely controlled vital auxiliaries, power sources, switches, andvalves to be visually indicated in the machinery spaces and at the cognizantremote control location. The second sentence of the note to the proposedrule provided that if status was clearly indicated by other instrumentation,such as pump status indicated by pump output pressure indication, additionalstatus indication would not be necessary. One comment recommended thatthis provision in the note be deleted because the distinct status indicatorsat the ECC for pumps provide valuable information in determining the causeof low pressure alarms. The note in the final rule has been revised toincorporate this recommendation.Paragraph (b)(5) of the proposed rule required that all data displays requiredto be alarmed must have continuous or demand instrumentation displays inthe machinery spaces unless Table 62.35-50 specified otherwise. One commentsaid this requirement appeared to be a change in policy because NVIC 1-69required the displays to be at the ECC, and recommended that the past policybe continued to aid the operator in monitoring the plant. There was nointent to modify the policy in NVIC 1-69. The final rule has been rewordedto emphasize that instrumentation displays must be provided in the EECor in the machinery andCx.23;space if an ECC is not provided.Proposed paragraph (d)(1)(ii) required alarms to clearly distinguish betweenfire, general, CO<T2>2</T2>/halon, machinery, flooding, and non-vital alarms. One commentsaid that the engineers' assistance-needed alarm of 46 CFR Subpart 113.37should be added to the list because of its importance. The final rule hasbeen changed to adopt this recommendation.One comment said this rule should specify colors for alarm indicators.This recommendation has not been incorporated. The markings required forgeneral alarms and fire safety alarms can be found in the individual vesselsubchapters. The Coast Guard will continue its policy of accepting anyconsistent application of optional automation alarm color codes, pendingthe completion of the Code for Alarms presently being developed by theInternational Maritime Organization (IMO).Paragraph (d)(2) of the rule says that required alarms in high ambientnoise areas must be supplemented by visual means, such as rotating beacons.One comment recommended that if there are non-vital alarms in high ambientnoise areas, they should consist of rotating beacons only to minimize confusionwith the required alarms. This recommendation has not been adopted. A requirementfor beacons on non-vital alarms, in addition to the beacons already necessaryto draw attention to<T3> required</T3> alarms, will only add to confusion and difficulty inproviding distinct alarm indication. Paragraph (d)(6) of the proposed rule required failure of a control oralarm system to be alarmed at a manned control station. One comment saidthat for unattended plants, this would result in unnecessary alarms onthe bridge. The comment said this rule appears to conflict with andSection;62.25-20(g)(3), which requires minimization of bridge alarms, and recommendedthat these alarms only be extended to the engineers' accommodations. Thefinal rule has been changed to require the alarm in the machinery spacesand at the ECC, if provided. The rule was not intended to unnecessarilyrequire alarms on the bridge. Paragraph (e)(vii) of the final rule requires audible alarms to annunicateuntil manually acknowledged. One comment recommended that manual acknowledgmentbe required at the ECC in accordance with past Coast Guard policy. Thefinal rule has not been changed. NVIC 1-69 and these rules do not requirea central control station unless the vessel is automated to replace specificpersonnel or to reduce overall crew requirements. If an ECC is not providedor required, the alarms may be safely located and acknowledged at the equipment.If an ECC is required, then the rules require alarms and manual acknowledgmentat the ECC, as recommended by the comment. Section 62.25-25 Programmable and Adjustable Systems and Devices Paragraph (a) of the rule prohibits programmable control or alarm systemlogic from being altered after design-verification testing without theapproval of the OCMI. It also requires a means, acceptable to the OCMI,to make sure setpoints remain within the safe operating range of the equipment.Four comments said this requirement should not prohibit the normal practiceof adjusting setpoints and tuning vital system automation. The rule hasnot been changed. It does not restrict the adjustment of setpoints withinthe safe operating range of the equipment. It requires a means to makesure that safety trip control, safety limit control, and alarm setpointscannot be readily or inadvertently adjusted to the extent that they becomemeaningless and ineffective in ensuring safety and preventing equipmentdamage. One comment said the rule would require numerous spare circuit boards tobe carried, instead of allowing replaceable multiple-use boards that aretypically carried and recalibrated on board. The rule has not been changed.It does not prohibit or make the use of multiple use boards impracticable.The<T3> logic</T3> of the calibrated board in a specific application cannotbe changed without the approval of the OCMI because it can represent are-design of the approved system. Proposed paragraph 62.25-25(b) required operating programs for microprocessor-basedor computer-based vital control, alarm, and monitoring systems to be storedin memory that did not rely on mechanical devices. One comment recommendedthat mechanical memory storage such as disk drives be permitted if providedin duplicate. The final rule has been changed in accordance with this commentto permit disk drives and similar mechanical devices. Analysis and experiencewith such installations since the NPRM have shown they can be safely applied.These devices are subject to failure analysis under the provisions of andSection;62.20-3(b)(2). Paragraph (c) of the rule provides that if microprocessor-based or computer-basedsystems serve both vital and non-vital systems hardware and software prioritiesmust favor the vital systems. One comment recommended that failures thatcause incorrect priorities be alarmed. The rule has not been changed. Thesesystems are subject to failure analysis to identify such malfunctions,and the rules require failure of all vital control and alarm systems, includingmicroprocessor-based and computer-based systems, to be alarmed. Section 62.25-30 Environmental Design Standards Paragraph (a)(4) of the proposed rule required automation to be designedto be suitable for a relative humidity of 0 to 100%. Two comments recommendedchanging the requirement to 0 to 95% relative humidity because it is typicalfor industry design and because 100% relative humidity is unrealistic andwill create unnecessary costs and design changes for previously acceptableequipment. The final rule has been changed in accordance with these commentsto require automation to be suitable for 0 to 95% relative humidity. Paragraph 62.25-30(b) of the final rule requires low voltage electronicsto be designed with due consideration for static discharge, electromagneticinterference (EMI), fungal growth, and contact corrosion. One comment saidthat an EMI standard such as MIL-STD-461B should be referenced. This recommendationhas not been adopted. Incorporation of a specific EMI standard such asMIL-STD-461B would unnecessarily eliminate other equally effective andless stringent performance criteria to prevent EMI. Section 62.30-5(b) Independence The proposed rule required the primary control, alternate control, andsafety control systems for any vital system to be independent of each other,and required alarm and instrumentation systems to be independent of primaryand alternate control systems, including sensors. Four comments said thatthe rule should also require alarm and instrumentation systems to be independentof primary control, alternate controls, and safety controls because theclassification societies require this type of independence and becausethis would make safety systems independent of alarm systems, thus enhancingtheir reliability. The final rule has been changed to adopt this recommendation.This change will prevent an unnecessary and costly conflict with the requirementsof the classification societies while maintaining acceptable functionalindependence criteria. Four comments recommended deleting the requirement for having independentsensors because they are expensive, preclude some safe parallel redundantcontrol and monitoring schemes, and are impractical in many cases. Twocomments supported having independent sensors for propulsion control speedor pitch feedback because sensor failure can result in system runawaysbut indicated that additional requirements concerning independent sensorsare unnecessary. The final rule has been changed to require sensors forprimary speed, pitch, and direction of rotation control in closed looppropulsion control systems to be independent and physically separate fromrequired safety control, alarm, or instrumentation sensors. Coast Guardcasualty records confirm that propulsion control feedback sensor failurecan result in propulsion machinery runaway. The final rule has also beenchanged to delete the requirement for other alarm and instrumentation sensorsto be independent for the reasons given in the comments and because anypotential impact on safety is substantially offset by requiring alarm andinstrumentation systems to be independent of primary controls, alternatecontrols, and safety controls. One comment said that certain critical functions such as ``stop'' shouldnot be processed by a computer and should be separate and independent becauseexperience showed that a computer malfunction has resulted in a shutdownfailure. The final rule has been changed to require the propulsion safetytrip control of andSection; 62.35-5(c)(1)(ii) to be independent and physicallyseparate. This is consistent with past Coast Guard policy in NVIC 1-69and the application of SOLAS requiring these safety trip controls to beindependent and physically separate. Section 62.30-5(c) Power Source Failure Alarm The proposed rule required failure of either of the two required powersources to cause an alarm in the machinery spaces. One comment said thatonly the loss of the normal source should be alarmed because SOLAS onlyrequires alarming of the normal source. This recommendation has been adoptedfor the reason given and because the visible indicator and test switchrequirements for emergency power sources in 46 CFR Subpart 112.45 provideprotection equivalent to alarming the failure of the emergency power source.Section 62.30-15(b) Built-In Test Equipment The proposed rule required built-in test equipment that failed to returnthe tested system to normal operation to cause an alarm at a manned controllocation. One comment recommended that the requirement for an alarm bedeleted because it is unnecessary, expensive, and the required indicatorat the control station provides sufficient information to the operator.The final rule has been changed to delete the requirement for an alarm.In addition to the reasons given, the criteria for causing the alarm,<T3> e.g.,</T3> operator not in attendance, time, etc., can be very subjective.Section 62.35-5 Remote Propulsion Control Systems This section addresses propulsion control in terms of speed and directionof thrust of the propeller. One comment said that this approach is toogeneral and may allow interpretations deviating from the intent of SOLASand Coast Guard policy. The comment recommended that the concept of propulsioncontrol be addressed more specifically in terms of discrete engine speedcontrol and propeller direction control. This recommendation has not beenincorporated. The performance requirements in these rules and SOLAS areintended to address overall vessel propulsion control, regardless of whetherit is attained by integrated or discrete engine speed control or propellercontrol. Paragraph (c)(3) of the proposed rule required an indicator to be providedat the main pilothouse control location to annunicate when the shaft directionor the pitch of a controllable pitch propeller did not match that commandedby the navigating bridge operator control device. Two comments stated thatthis requirement is unnecessary because the required indication is providedby the shaft speed and thrust indicators required by Subpart 113.37 ofthis Chapter. This recommendation has been adopted, and proposed paragraph(c)(3), as well as the listing for an associated main propulsion remotecontrol wrong direction alarm in Table 62.35-50, have been deleted fromthe final rules. The intent of the proposal was to indicate failure ofthe propulsion control system. The indications required by 46 CFR Subpart113.37, in conjunction with the requirements for failure analysis, failsafeoperation of propulsion controls, and alarming of propulsion control failureadequately meet the intent.Paragraph (c)(1) of the rules navigating bridge propulsion control to includeautomatic performance of all associated services and not to allow overloadingof the propulsion machinery during normal operation. One comment recommendedextending the overload protection criteria to other control locations.This recommendation has not been adopted. The engineers in the ECC or atthe local manual control station are generally more familiar with the limitationsof the machinery and have more detailed instrumentation available to monitorpossible overload. One comment said the rule should include protectionduring abnormal operation because overloads may be higher. This recommendationhas been adopted. The intent of the requirement, as stated in NVIC 1-69and SOLAS, is to prevent overload of the propulsion system as the resultof movement of the bridge control device. The final rule has been changedto require the control system to prevent the rate of movement of the controldevice from causing overload of the propulsion machinery. Paragraph (c)(3) of the final rule requires alarms on vessels propelledby internal combustion engines to indicate starting power of less than50% of the required capability. It also requires that if automatic startingis provided, the number of automatic consecutive attempts that fail toproduce a start must be limited to a reserve of 50% of the required startingcapacity, which is required to be 12 starts for reversing engines, and6 starts for non-reversing engines. Two comments recommended that the rulebe changed to require limiting the number of automatic consecutive attemptsto three, after which an alarm sounds and reset of the equipment by theoperator is necessary prior to further automatic starting attempts. Thisrecommendation has not been adopted. However, the recommendation representsan acceptable option that is consistent with the rule and the requirementsof SOLAS and the classification societies. One comment said that there should be no limit on the number of automaticconsecutive attempts because the low starting air alarms required by thissection and the ability of the operator to override automatic startingattempts constitutes adequate protection against inadvertent depletionof starting capacity. This recommendation has not been incorporated. Itis contrary to common industry practice and SOLAS requirements which limitautomatic starting attempts to safeguard starting power. Paragraph (d) of the rule incorporates ABS provisions which require automaticremote primary control systems to automatically prevent control locationtransfer from significantly altering propelling thrust. One comment saidthese requirements are unnecessary because it is normal practice for operatorsto manually align control levers before transfer to equalize signals atboth stations and therefore prevent a change in thrust. The final rulehas not been changed because it reflects NVIC 1-69 and SOLAS requirements.Many automation designs are arranged so that control transfer cannot occurunless the control levers are aligned as described by the comment. Proposed paragraph (f)(2) required an automatic propulsion turbine safetytrip to prevent inadvertent movement as a result of control system malfunction.One comment recommended that this requirement be deleted because the tripcould itself malfunction and unnecessarily result in the loss of propulsion.This recommendation has been adopted. The proposed trip requirement hasbeen deleted for the reason given and because the requirement in paragraph(e)(3) of the final rule for propulsion control systems to be failsafeprovides the intended protection against inadvertent vessel movement resultingfrom control system malfunction. Paragraph (e)(2) in the final rule permits a temporary override, locatedat the main navigating bridge control location, for propulsion machineryautomatic safety trips. One comment said that these overrides should notbe permitted because bridge personnel do not have the training or informationnecessary to make decisions concerning the propulsion machinery. The rulehas not been changed. These optional overrides are permitted by SOLAS,are common industry practice, and have been accepted by the Coast Guardin the past. If an owner or operator does not feel the bridge personnelhave the training or information necessary to make decisions concerningthe propulsion machinery, they have the option not to install or permituse of the override. In other cases, the overrides permit the bridge personnelto reduce power settings or maintain steerage in emergency maneuveringsituations. Paragraph (e)(3) of the final rule requires remote propulsion control systemsto be failsafe by maintaining the preset speed and direction of thrustuntil local manual or manual alternate control is in operation. Three commentssuggested clarification of the term preset. One of these comments suggestedthat preset means ``as is''. Another suggested that preset means the settingof the mechanical speed governor. The final rule clarifies that presetmeans ``as is,'' as the SOLAS regulation has been interpreted by the CoastGuard, classification societies, and manufacturers in the past. This permitsthe operator to either maintain plant status until local or alternate controlis achieved, or to trip the plant using the manually activated safety triprequired by andSection; 62.35-5(b)(2). These options are superior to ``trip''or ``Zero'' in a maneuvering situation. In some specific cases, where itdoes not result in a significant speed change, the preset setting of themechanical speed governor is acceptable, but must be evaluated on a case-by-casebasis. One comment said that only loss of control power should be considered asa cause when evaluating failures of remote propulsion controls for compliancewith this rule. This recommendation has not been adopted. Other causesin addition to control power failures, such as loss of feedback signaland computer malfunction, have resulted in casualties involving propulsioncontrol failures. Section 62.35-10 Flooding Safety Paragraph (a)(1) of the proposal required automatic bilge pumps to be providedwith an independent bilge high level alarm system. Three comments recommendedthat bilge high level alarms be permitted as part of the central alarmsystem because this has been permitted by NVIC 1-69. This recommendationhas been adopted. The final rule has been changed to require bilge highlevel alarms to be independent of the automatic bilge pump controls. Thisis consistent with the requirements of NVIC 1-69 and there was no intentto modify that policy. Paragraph (a)(2) of the rule requires automatic bilge pumps to be monitoredto detect excessive operation in a specified time period. One comment recommendedthat the time period be specified. The final rule has not been changed.The intent is to detect excessive leakage which may be a prelude to a majorcasualty, and the time period for detection depends on variables that aredifferent for each ship, such as size of the pump and size of the bilgewells. The operator usually establishes the time based on the particularsof the vessel,<T3> e.g.,</T3> the time it takes for the automatic bilge pump to drainthe bilge well. Section 62.35-20 Oil Fired Main Boilers Proposed paragraph (c)(1) required automatic combustion control subsystemsto provide the air/fuel ratio necessary for complete combustion and stableflame with the fuel in use, but in no case less than 10% excess air. Fourcomments recommended deleting the requirement for 10% excess air becauseit is inefficent and safe operation can be obtained with excess air ofless than 5%. This recommendation has been adopted. The final rule as changedshould allow flexibility in attaining a safe and efficient air/fuel ratio.This change essentially retains the air/fuel ratio provision in NVIC 1-69.One comment recommended that automatic combustion controls be requiredto have a low fire interlock to prevent boiler damage during warn up, asrequired by NVIC 1-69. This recommendation has been adopted, and a newsubparagraph (c)(3) has been added to require automatic combustion controlsubsystems to provide a low fire interlock to prevent high firing rateand superheater damage during boiler warm-up. This was an unintended omissionfrom the NPRM. Paragraph (d)(1) requires boilers to undergo a continuous purge of at least5 changes of air volume. This is a change of policy from the minimum offour changes of air required by NVIC 1-69. One comment said the changefrom the past policy is unjustified. This recommendation has not been adopted.Boiler flareback casualties have been attributed to inadequate purging,and the National Fire Protection Association and the Society of Naval Architectsand Marine Engineers both recommend more than 4 changes of air. There isno cost increase associated with this requirement. Proposed paragraph (d)(2)(ii) required that boiler air flow during lightoff be at least 25 percent of boiler full load volumetric air flow. Thiswas a change from past policy intended to preclude pocketting of combustiblegases and ensure an air rich condition for safe light off. Three commentssaid this proposed requirement should be reconsidered because it is overlyrestrictive, the airflow necessary for lightoff varies from installationto installation, and the proposal is contrary to the practice of closedregister light off recommended by many manufacturers. The final rule hasbeen revised by deleting the 25% airflow criteria and by requiring totalboiler airflow during lightoff to be sufficient to prevent pocketting andexplosive accumulations of combustible gases,<T3> i.e.,</T3> to provide an air rich furnace atmosphere. This changeis consistent with the intent of the proposed rule, and permits necessaryperformance flexibility. Proposed subparagraph (d)(2)(iv) required the burner trial for ignitionperiod to be no longer than 5 seconds. This was a deliberate change fromNVIC 1-69, which permitted trial for ignition periods of up to 15 seconds.The proposed rule was intended to minimize the amount of unburned fuelthat enters the boiler. One comment said 5 seconds is too short becauseit won't allow settling of air flow after the purge that immediately precedestrial for ignition. One comment said it should be increased to 10 seconds,and two comments recommended that the NVIC 1-69 requirement of 15 secondsbe continued. The final rule has been changed to require the trial forignition period to be as short as practical for the specific installation,but in no case longer than 15 seconds. This will allow periods longer than5 seconds, if necessary, while minimizing entry of unburned fuel into theboiler. Subparagraph (d)(3)(ii) prohibits automatic increases in air flow to theboiler following boiler safety trip control operation. One comment saidthat the rule should be changed to require operation of the boiler safetytrip control to cause immediate automatic post-purge of the boiler to clearthe furnace of unburned oil vapors. This recommendation has not been adopted.Boiler safety trip occurs when there is a problem, such as flame failure.Automatically increasing airflow can result in an explosive atmospherein a malfunctioning hot boiler. Following boiler safety trip, air flowchanges should be gradual and under manual control, preferably after thecause of the trip has been determined and corrected. Paragraph (i) lists the conditions that must result in closing the masterand all burner fuel oil valves. One comment recommended that burner valveposition feedback to the burner and boiler safety trip controls be requiredand that unsuccessful burner shutdown be an additional condition that causesvalve closure. In support of the recommendation the comment said this wouldensure that the commanded valve position actually occurred and would encourageproper maintenance of valves and valve actuators. This recommendation hasnot been adopted. It could result in tripping the boiler because of unsuccessfulshutdown of a single burner, causing a loss of propulsion or loss of electricpower to the vessel. Instead, a requirement for burner valve status instrumentation(open/closed) has been added to Table 62.35-50 to provide the recommendedburner valve position feedback to the operator. This requirement is consistentwith andSection; 62.25-20(b)(3), which requires the status of automaticallyor remotely controlled vital valves to be visually indicated. Section 62.35-35 Internal Combustion Engines Proposed paragraph (b) required all controls and alarms for gas turbinesto be provided at a centralized control location. This rule has been deletedbecause it unnecessarily duplicates the requirements of andSection;andSection;58.10-15 and 62.25-20(g). Section 62.35-40(b)(1) Coal Fuels The proposed rule provided that systems and equipment that operate on coalor two types of fuel, such as oil/gas, oil/coal, heated/unheated oil, andheavy/light oil require special consideration by the Commandant (G-MTH).Three comments said that, with the exception of coal, the rules are adequatefor safety without special consideration by the Commandant, and recommendedthat the rule only require special consideration of coal systems. Thisrecommendation has been adopted. There are sufficient requirements in Part62 and elsewhere in Title 46 CFR to address the safety of oil-gas, heated/unheatedoil, and heavy/light oil fuel systems. The final rule only requires controlsand instrumentation for coal systems to be subject to special considerationby the Commandant (G-MTH).Section 62.35-50 Tabulated Monitoring and Safety Control Requirements forSpecific SystemsThe rule includes a tabulation of automated system instrumentation, alarms,and safety control requirements that apply if the system listed is providedor required. The tabulation includes the requirements in Part 62 and providesclarifying notes. The table has been developed from NVIC 1-69, SOLAS, andexperience gained with past and contemporary designs.The table does not specify instrumentation location. One comment recommendedthat the table specify instrument location as local, remote, or both. Thisrecommendation has not been adopted. The location requirements vary withvessel configuration and degree of automation, <T3>e.g.,</T3> if an ECC is provided or required, or if the vessel is designedfor minimally attended or periodically unattended machinery spaces, etc.Location requirements can be found in andSection; 62.25-20(b) (InstrumentationLocation), andSection; 62.25.20(g) (Central Control Locations), andSection;62.01-5(d) (Central Control Rooms), Subpart 62.35 (Requirements for SpecificTypes of Automated Vital Systems), and andSection;andSection; 62.50-20 and62.50-30 (Additional Requirements for Minimally Attended and PeriodicallyUnattended Machinery Spaces).The proposal included requirements for engine coolant tank level instrumentation.One comment recommended deleting this requirement because it was excessive,exceeded the requirements of classification societies, and the low levelalarm provided adequate safety. This recommendation has been adopted forthese reasons.The proposal included a requirement to monitor main propulsion diesel enginefuel oil pressure to injectors. Two comments recommended changing thisrequirement to monitoring of fuel oil booster pressure because the highpressure of fuel oil to injectors is impractical and dangerous to monitor.This recommendation has been adopted for the reason stated.One comment recommended that an alarm to indicate standby generator failureshould be added to the table. This recommendation has not been adopted.The lack of ship service power will be obvious and the other ship serviceand emergency generator alarms provide adequate indication.One comment recommended that pitch indication be included in the tablerequirement for main propulsion remote control shaft thrust instrumentation.This recommendation has been adopted. Pitch indication is required by  andSection; 113.37-5.One comment recommended adding auxiliary boiler alarms to the table. Thisrecommendation has been adopted, and the rule has been changed to requirerunning indication and a trip alarm for vital auxiliary boilers, with referenceto the detailed control and alarm requirements in Part 63, Control Systemsfor Automatic Auxiliary Heating Equipment. The reason for this change isto provide operators with summary status information and failure informationfor auxiliary boilers that are vital; <T3>e.g.,</T3> they provide steam for ship service turbo-generators orfor heating fuel used in propulsion engines. This requirement is similarto the instrumentation and alarm requirements for other vital auxiliarieslisted in the table.One comment recommended that the table require an exhaust gas temperaturedeviation alarm for each exhaust belt of diesel main propulsion enginesand diesel generator engines, where more than one exhaust belt is provided,because it would alarm failure of a fuel pump. This recommendation hasnot been adopted. The individual cylinder deviation alarms required bythe table provide adequate indication of fuel pump failure.<T3>Note </T3>18 in the proposed Table required fire detection systemsto use flame or smoke detectors, or a combination of these. Two commentsrecommended changing this requirement becuase SOLAS does not permit theuse of flame detectors alone. This recommendation has been adopted andthe rule has been changed to agree with SOLAS and current Coast Guard policy.The note now says that the use of thermal detectors alone is subject tospecial consideration by the Commandant (G-MTH), and flame detectors mayonly be used in conjunction with smoke or thermal detectors.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart 62.50 Automated Self Propelled Vessel Manning.</ITAG>Sections 62.50-20 and 62.50-30 specify additional requirements for minimallyattended machinery plants and periodically unattended machinery plants.Two comments recommended defining the terms minimally attended machineryplants and periodically unattended machinery plants. The preamble to theNPRM included descriptions of these terms. These descriptions have beenincluded as notes to andSection;andSection; 62.50-20 and 62.50-30 in the finalrules to provide clarification of the terms.The rules do not specify engineering manning or watchstander levels onautomated vessels. NVIC 1-69 provided general guidelines for the reductionof manning in machinery spaces on automated vessels, and also referredto the elimination of specific watchstanders by the installation of specificautomation. These rules, NVIC 1-69, and the manning rules in Part 15 ofthis chapter refer to the OCMI as the authority who specifies an automatedvessel's minimum manning based upon the evaluation of the vessel's equipment,automation reliability, planned maintenance program, crew organizationalstructure, trade, route, and other factors listed in andSection;andSection;62.50-1, 15.501(b), 15.705(a), and 15.715. Three comments recommended thatthe rule specify standard minimum manning levels for automated enginerooms.Two of these comments said that without specific standard manning levels,the OCMI might be subject to pressure to reduce manning below levels necessaryfor safety, and that manning levels for similar vessels would vary fromOCMI to OCMI and port to port. The third comment said that arbitrary judgmentsby OCMI's would be disastrous to commercial eocnomics and labor/managementrelations. A fourth comment entirely supported the proposed approach taken.The recommendation to specify standard manning levels has not been adopted.The OCMI has the authority and responsibility to issue the Certificateof Inspection which specifies the vessel's complement. The OCMI determinesthe minimum complement consistent with safety based upon evaluation ofthe crew and vessel to meet the criteria described above. There is no changefrom NVIC 1-69 to the final rule regarding the OCMI's role. Coast GuardHeadquarters has been involved for several years in evaluating the safemanning of each and every automated vessel and in administering a CoastGuard wide uniform manning policy. This Headquarters involvement shouldprevent inconsistencies or arbitrary judgments by OCMI's referred to inthe comments.As stated in the NPRM, the references to specific levels of manning andwatchstanders in NVIC 1-69 have misled people into believing that if specificautomation is provided, specific manning is assured, without regard tothe other essential criteria in these rules and the manning rules and inthe new Part 15. The Coast Guard's policy has been, and continues to be,the emphasis of these latter considerations. The lack of reference to specificmanning levels and watchstander levels in the rule is intended to eliminatethe misconception that specific manning is assured if specific equipmentis provided.One comment recommended that the rules require a licensed engineer andan unlicensed rating to be on watch in automated enginerooms. The commentsaid it would afford the crew and vessel a reasonable degree of safety,allow simultaneous monitoring and maintenance of automated equipment, provideadditional help and a back-up crewmember if necessary, and provide sufficientpersonnel to cope with emergencies. This recommendation has not been incorporated.The setting of watches is the responsibility of the master of the vessel.The comment's reasons for requiring watchstanders are among the considerationsin determining the crew complement necessary for the safe operation ofthe vessel, including evaluation of the complement necessary to allow themaster to set appropriate watches.Section 62.50-1 GeneralSection 62.50-1(b)(3) requires the engineering manning of vessels incorporatingautomated vital systems to be conditioned by the proven performance ofthe plant during an initial trial period. Two comments requested clarificationas to whether builder's sea trials are suitable for this purpose. A thirdcomment recommended that successful builder's sea trials be accepted asthe trial period for determining crew complement because this is commonpractice for some foreign flags and it would place U.S. flag vessels ina more competitive economic position. Sea trials are not considered tobe adequate to evaluate the reliability of the vessel's automated systems.It is longstanding Coast Guard policy, as expressed in NVIC 1-69 and insection 15.715 of the Title 46 CFR, to require a period of proven operationand reliability of the automation following initial testing and de-bugging(<T3>i.e,</T3> after builder's sea trials) before establishing the finalcrew complement. SOLAS II-1/31.3 and 46.2 also require measures to be takento ensure that the equipment is functioning in a reliable manner.Experience has shown that the safety precaution of a trial period not onlyhelps identify possible ship design and automation problem areas, but italso helps identify problems with the crew organization and complementin responding to emergencies, automation failures, and in maintaining andoperating the vessel. The length of the trial period varies, with 6 monthsbeing typical for the first in a class of vessels. Subsequent vessels ina class having no major system changes typically undergo shorter trialperiods, depending on the circumstances. The complete elimination of thetrial period and acceptance of the builder's sea trials may provide someeconomic benefit to some U.S. flag operators, depending on the labor/managementcollective bargaining agreement. However, any benefit is more than offsetby the potential inadequacy of the automation, crew complement, or creworganization, as demonstrated by some U.S. flag vessels which have hadtheir trial periods extended because of problems encountered with unsafeor unreliable automation during the required trial period.Paragraph (c) of the rule states that equipment provided to replace specificcrewmembers or to reduce overall crew requirements that proves unsafe orunreliable in the judgment of the cognizant OCMI must be immediately replacedor repaired or vessel manning will be modified to compensate for the equipmentinadequacy. One comment said that this rule's provision regarding modificationsin manning should be deleted because subjecting vessel manning to re-evaluationintroduces unacceptable economic uncertainty for vessel operators. Thisrecommendation has not been adopted. It would permit vessels whose automationproved unsafe or unreliable subsequent to the initial trial period, orwhose maintenance requirements increased as the vessel aged, to operatein the unsafe condition of having an inadequate crew complement. The operatorhas the option, instead of increasing the vessel complement to compensatefor equipment inadequacy, of replacing or repairing the equipment thatproves unsafe or unreliable. Both of these options have been used in thepast.Section 62.50-20 Additional Requirements for Minimally Attended MachineryPlantsParagraph (d) of the rules requires ECC control of the main machinery spacefire pumps. One comment recommended deleting this requirement because itexceeds SOLAS, which only requires fire pump control from the navigatingbridge. This recommendation has not been adopted. The fire pump controlledfrom the navigating bridge is not always located in the main machineryspace, and remote control of the main machinery space fire pumps from theECC under minimally attended conditions compensates for the crewmembersthat would otherwise be present to start machinery space fire pumps. Also,remote control permits those in attendance to perform such tasks as bringingadditional electrical generating capacity into play. This requirement isconsistent with longstanding requirements in NVIC's 1-69 and 6-72, Guideto Fixed Fire Fighting Equipment Aboard Merchant Vessels. The intent ofthis rule is to ensure that the firemain can be charged as quickly as possiblein the event of a fire.Paragraph (e) of the proposed rules required the controls for machineryspace fixed gas fire extinguishing systems to be operable from the ECC,except for systems that protect the ECC, which must have controls outsidethe ECC exit that is independent of the machinery space. Two comments recommendeddeleting the requirement for control from the ECC because it does not increasesafety and it unnecessarily exceeds SOLAS requirements. This recommendationhas been adopted for the reasons given and because the crew actions involvingoperation of fixed gas fire extinguishing systems should be the same regardlessof manning: evacuate the space, secure the ventilation, and operate thefire extinguishing system from outside the space. Additional control locationrequirements in the ECC for minimally attended machinery spaces are notconsidered necessary.Paragraph (e)(2) of the proposed rule required that either automatic bilgepumps be provided to dewater machinery space locations where liquid mightaccumulate, or that the ECC be required to include the controls necessaryto bring at least one of the bilge pumps required by Subpart 56.50 of thischapter into operation to dewater these locations. Two comments said thatcontrol from the ECC of the bilge pumps required by Subpart 56.50 shouldbe mandatory, instead of an option, to allow timely action to counter floodingin an emergency. This recommendation has been adopted and the requiredalternative of providing automatic bilge pumps has been deleted from paragraph(e)(2) of the final rules. The provision of control of a bilge pump fromthe ECC has long been one of the required alternatives in NVIC 1-69. Also,it is the intent of SOLAS II-1/31.3 and 48 to ensure the ability to taketimely and effective action to counter flooding. Automatic bilge pumpsare typically small pumps intended for the removal of routine accumulationsthat are ineffective to counter flooding.One comment said that the proposed rule did not adequately address therequirements in SOLAS II-1/48.3 for the location of valve controls forprotection against flooding. This was an oversight and a new paragraph(e)(4) has been added to include the provisions of the SOLAS rule, whichare essentially the same as the corresponding provision in NVIC 1-69. Thenew paragraph (e)(4) requires controls for the sea inlet and dischargevalves and emergency bilge suction valves to be provided and be so arrangedto allow time for operation in the event of flooding with the vessel inthe fully loaded condition. Section 62.01-5(d), <T3>Central Control Rooms,</T3> has also been amended to include this provisionbecause it is required by SOLAS II-1/31.3, regardless of manning.Paragraph (g)(1) requires the ECC to include controls and instrumentationnecessary to place the ship service and propulsion generators in servicein 30 seconds. Two comments said that NVIC 1-69 did not have a time criteriaof 30 seconds and recommended that the time criteria be deleted. Reasonsgiven were that (1) it is impractical for vessels with two steam turbogeneratorsto meet the time criteria, (2) the criteria exceed the baseline <T3>Assumption</T3> of the rulemaking that the safety of vessels with automatedvital systems must be at least equal to that of a vessel with its vitalsystems under direct manual supervision, and (3) it would make it difficultfor existing vessels with two steam turbo-generators to be automated forthe purpose of reducing the crew complement. The 30 second criteria hasbeen retained in the final rules. It is essential to the safety of thevessel to restore ship service and propulsion electrical power as quicklyas possible, and this criteria is readily attained by contemporary new-constructionto which this rule applies. Existing vessels with steam turbo-generatorsshould be able to comply with the 30 second criteria if they provide alevel of safety and electrical power continuity to vital loads equivalentto that required by this rule. It will not apply to existing vessels thatdo not undergo modification or do not request a change in manning indicatedon the certificate of inspection, <T3>e.g.,</T3> vessels previously evaluated under the provisions of NVIC's1-69 or 6-84.Proposed paragraph (h)(3) required remote starting and connection fromthe ECC of manually started or controlled electrical power sources requiredby Subpart 112.05. This proposal has been deleted because it duplicatedthe requirements of Subpart 112.35.Section 62.50-30 Additional Requirements for Periodically Unattended MachineryPlantsParagraph (a) requires compliance with this section to be met in additionto the requirements in andSection;62.50-20 (Minimally Attended MachinerySpaces). One comment said that the personnel alarm of andSection;62.50-20(b)(1)incorporated by this rule should not be required on vessels designed forperiodically unattended machinery plant operation because it is an expensivenuisance that serves no purpose on these vessels. The final rule has notbeen changed. The requirement for the personnel alarm in andSection;62.50-20(b)(1)is a longstanding requirement of NVIC 1-69 that is intended to monitorcrew well-being in the event that an automation failure in a plant designedfor periodically unattended operation results in minimally attended operation.This alarm also permits the master the option of operating the machineryplant in a minimally attended mode, as opposed to a periodically unattendedmode.Proposed paragraph (f) included a note that the requirement for certainECC alarms to be extended to the engineers' accommodations could be metby operation of the engineers' assistance-needed alarm. One comment recommendeddeleting this option because one function of the engineers' assistance-neededalarm is to indicate the non-response of the duty engineers to an alarmcondition, and if the engineers' assistance-needed alarm fails for anyreason, neither the original alarm nor the duty engineers' non-responsewill be indicated in the engineers' accommodations. This recommendationhas been adopted and the note has been deleted for the reasons given.Paragraph (h) requires a fire control station located outside the machineryspaces. One comment recommended adding to the rule the requirement thatcontrol of machinery space oil piping positive shutoff valves requiredby andSection;56.50-60(d) be located at this central fire control station.This recommendation has been adopted. The final rule is consistent withNVIC 1-69, SOLAS, and classification society requirements.Paragraph (j) of the proposed rule required automatic bilge pumps to beprovided for periodically unattended machinery spaces. One comment recommendeddeleting this requirement because it is counterproductive to safety, cangive a false sense of security, and because these pumps can permit leaksin machinery piping to go undetected without causing either a bilge highlevel alarm or an automatic bilge pump excessive run alarm to alert thecrew. This comment said that bilge high level alarms provide better protection.This recommendation has been adopted for the reasons stated and becauseautomatic bilge pumps are an option usually provided for removal of routinebilge accumulations. The bilge high level alarms recommended by the commentare required by andSection;62.50-20(e)(1).Paragraph (k) of the rule requires the electrical plant to be arrangedin such a way that upon failure of any one operating ship service generator,power to the main switchboard loads essential to propulsion, maneuvering,and safety is automatically maintained or restored within 30 seconds. Onecomment recommended permitting the generator to restore power within 45seconds, instead of 30 seconds, to coincide with the requirements of theABS. This recommendation has not been adopted. It is essential that shipservice power be restored as quickly as possible in the event of a blackout.Also, contemporary designs readily comply with this criteria, which hasbeen a longstanding requirement in NVIC 1-69. Relaxation of this safetycriteria is not justified.Section 113.35-3 Engine Order Telegraph Systems, GeneralParagraph (f) of the rule requires engine order telegraph and remote propulsioncontrol systems to be separate and independent, except that a single operatorcontrol device with separate transmitters and connections for each systemmay be used. Two comments recommended that the single operator controldevice be required instead of being an option, because it reduces confusionand is safer because the operator uses the same lever for engine ordersin all operating modes. This recommendation has not been adopted. A singleoperator control device is not being required because it would preventoptional use of numerous independent engine order telegraph system designsthat have been used safely and effectively for years.One comment said the requirement for separate transmitters and connectionsshould be deleted because it is unnecessary and serves no purpose. Thisrecommendation has not been adopted. Separate transmitters and connectionsare required to permit the engine order telegraph to serve as an independentbackup means of passing propulsion orders in the event the remote propulsioncontrol system fails.Section 111.01-9 Watertight, Waterproof, and Dripproof EquipmentParagraph (b) of the rule requires central control consoles and similarenclosures to be dripproof, regardless of location. One comment said thatthis may not always be possible and alternatives should be offered suchas use in dry locations and use of dripshields. These recommendations havenot been adopted. Dripproof construction to prevent electrical damage ormalfunction from dripping, spilling, or sprayed fluids in common practice.<ITAG tagnum="84">Evaluation and Certification</ITAG>These regulations are considered to be non-major under Executive Order12291 and non-significant under the DOT regulatory policies and procedures(44 FR 11034; February 26, 1979). A regulatory evaluation has been preparedand placed in the rulemaking docket. The evaluation may be inspected andcopied at the address listed under <T2>ADDRESSES.</T2> Copies may also be obtained by contacting the personlisted under <T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT.</T2> The Coast Guard does not havespecific monetary information, nor does it have specific information onthe type of automation or the number of vessels that would apply for inspectionunder the rules. The evaluation is based on certain assumptions that characterizecurrent industry practice and trends relating to automation and vesselconstruction.The primary benefit of the rules will be increased safety for crewmembersand property. It is estimated that at least $1.6M per year in damages associatedwith U.S. flag vessel casualties can be averted by these requirements.It is also estimated that the rules will result in a net savings to themarine industry of $100,000 per year, or $5,000 per new vessel, as comparedto compliance with previous requirements and guidelines. The primary beneficiariesof these savings will be self-propelled vessel owners and operators, shipyards,and designers and manufacturers of automation systems. The savings willresult from the elimination of the requirement for certain equipment thatis of questionable safety value, more efficient and consistent evaluationof automation, and the reduction of costs associated with uncertainty andmisinterpretation of requirements.The rules should also produce an estimated annual cost savings for theCoast Guard of $15,000. These savings will result from possible furtherCoast Guard delegations of plan review and inspection functions to theABS, which may reduce certain duplications of effort. The ABS would alsobenefit monetarily from such a delegation.This rulemaking contains information collection and recordkeeping requirementsin sections 61.40-1(a), 61.40-1(c), 61.40-10(a), 62.50-20(h), 62.50-30(j),and Subpart 62.20. They have been previously submitted to the Office ofManagement and Budget for approval under the provisions of the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-511, 44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq.) and have beenapproved. Approval numbers have been assigned as set out in revised andSection;50.01-20of these rules.This action has been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteriacontained in Executive Order 12612, and it has been determined that thisrulemaking does not have sufficient federalism implications to warrantthe preparation of a Federalism Assessment.The Coast Guard has determined that this rulemaking does not significantlyaffect the environment. An Environmental Assessment was prepared in accordancewith COMDTINST 16475.1B, National Environmental Policy Act, ImplementingProcedures and Policy for Considering Environmental impacts. The EnvironmentalAssessment is included in the Final Evaluation. A finding of no significantimpact (FONSI) has been prepared. The Environmental Assessment and FONSIare available for public inspection and copying in the rulemaking docketat the address listed above under <T2>``ADDRESSES.''</T2>As the rules substantially involve the design, construction, and operationof large vessels, ferries, and coastal tankers, and freighters over 500gross tons, the Coast Guard certifies that these rules will not have asignificant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>46 CFR Part 50Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Vessels.46 CFR Part 52Marine safety, Vessels.46 CFR Part 56Marine safety, Vessels.46 CFR Part 58Oil and gas exploration, Marine safety, Vessels.46 CFR Part 61Marine safety, Vessels.46 CFR Part 62Electric power, Fire prevention, Incorporation by reference, Marine safety,Vessels.46 CFR Part 110Administrative practice and procedure, Coast Guard, Electric power, Vessels.46 CFR Part 111Electric power, Marine safety, Vessels.46 CFR Part 113Communications equipment, Fire prevention, Vessels.In consideration of the foregoing, Chapter 1 of Title 46, Code of FederalRegulations is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 52_POWER BOILERS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 52 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>2. In andSection;52.01-10, by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.01-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Automatic controls.</ITAG>(a) Each main boiler must meet the special requirements for automatic safetycontrols in andSection;62.35-20(a)(1) of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 50 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 46 App. U.S.C. 86; 43 U.S.C.1333 (d)(1), 1347(c), 1348(c), 1356(a)(2); 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>3a. In andSection;50.01-20, by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;50.01-20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">OMB Control Numbers assigned pursuant to the Paperwork Reduction Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Display.</T3><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s10,12</C> <H1>46 CFR Part or Section where Identified or Described</H1><H1>Current OMB Control No.</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Part 61<D>2115-0142</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Part 62<D>2115-0548</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Part 63<D>2115-0142</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 56_PIPING SYSTEMS AND APPURTENANCES</ITAG>4. The authority citation for Part 56 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>5. In andSection;56.50-80, by adding a new paragraph (i) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.50-80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lubricating oil system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) Steam driven propulsion machinery must be provided with an emergencysupply of lubricating oil that must operate automatically upon failureof the lubricating oil system. The emergency oil supply must be adequateto provide lubrication until the equipment comes to rest during automaticshutdown.6. In andSection;56.50-95, by revising the existing last sentence of paragraph(d)(1) and by adding an additional sentence immediately thereafter to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;56.50-95</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Overboard discharges and shell connections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d)(1) * * * These controls shall be readily accessible above the floorplates and shall be provided with indication showing whether the valveis opened or closed. Manned machinery spaces include the main machineryspace and are either attended by the crew or are automated in accordancewith Part 62 of this subchapter to be comparable to an attended space.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 58_MAIN AND AUXILIARY MACHINERY AND RELATED SYSTEMS</ITAG>7. The authority citation for Part 58 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703; 49 CFR 1.46, and all other authoritycitations in this part are removed.</ITAG>8. In Subpart 58.01, a new andSection;58.01-35 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;58.01-35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Main propulsion auxiliary machinery.</ITAG>Auxiliary machinery vital to the main propulsion system must be providedin duplicate unless the system served is provided in independent duplicate,or otherwise provides continued or restored propulsion capability in theevent of a failure or malfunction of any single auxiliary component.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Partial reduction of normal propulsion capability as a resultof malfunction or failure is acceptable if the reduced capability is notbelow that necessary for the vessel to run ahead at 7 knots or half speed,whichever is less, and is adequate to maintain control of the ship.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 61_PERIODIC TESTS AND INSPECTIONS</ITAG>9. The authority citation for Part 61 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>10. In Part 61, the table of contents is amended and a new Subpart 61.40is added, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 61.40_Design Verification and Periodic Testing of Vital SystemAutomation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.40-1 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.40-3 Design verification testing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.40-6 Periodic safety tests.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">61.40-10 Test procedure details.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 61.40_Design Verification and Periodic Testing of Vital SystemAutomation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;61.40-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) All automatically or remotely controlled or monitored vital systemsaddressed by Part 62 of this subchapter must be subjected to tests andinspections to evaluate the operation and reliability of controls, alarms,safety features, and interlocks. Test procedures must be submitted to theCoast Guard for approval.(b) Persons designated by the owner of the vessel shall conduct all testsand the Design Verification and Periodic Safety tests shall be witnessedby the Coast Guard.(c) Design Verification and Periodic Safety test procedure documents approvedby the Coast Guard must be retained aboard the vessel.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;61.40-3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Design verification testing.</ITAG>(a) Tests must verify that automated vital systems are designed, constructed,and operate in accordance with all applicable requirements of Part 62 ofthis subchapter. The tests must be based upon the failure analysis, ifrequired by andSection;62.20-3(b) of this subchapter, functional performancerequirements, and the Periodic Safety tests of andSection;61.40-6.(b) Tests must be performed immediately after the installation of the automatedequipment or before the issuance of the initial Certificate of Inspection.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;61.40-6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Periodic safety tests.</ITAG>(a) Periodic Safety tests must demonstrate the proper operation of theprimary and alternate controls, alarms, power sources, transfer overridearrangements, interlocks, and safety controls. Systems addressed must includefire detection and extinguishing, flooding safety, propulsion, maneuvering,electric power generation and distribution, and emergency internal communications.(b) Tests must be conducted at periodic intervals specified by the CoastGuard to confirm that vital systems and safety features continue to operatein a safe, reliable manner.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Normally, these tests are conducted annually.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;61.40-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Test procedure details.</ITAG>(a) Test procedure documents must be in a step-by-step or checkoff listformat. Each test instruction must specify equipment status, apparatusnecessary to perform the tests, safety precautions, safety control andalarm setpoints, the procedure to be followed, and the expected test result.(b) Test techniques must not simulate monitored system conditions by mis-adjustment,artificial signals, improper wiring, tampering, or revision of the systemunless the test would damage equipment or endanger personnel. In the lattercase, the use of a synthesized signal or condition applied to the sensoris acceptable if test equipment is maintained in good working order andis periodically calibrated to the satisfaction of the Officer in Charge,Marine Inspection. Other test techniques must be approved by the Commandant(G-MTH).11. Part 62 is added to 46 CFR Subchapter F to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="50">PART 62_VITAL SYSTEM AUTOMATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.01-General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.01-1 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.01-3 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.01-5 Applicability. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.05-Reference specifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.05-1 Incorporation by reference. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.10-Terms used </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.10-1 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.15-Equivalents </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.15-1 Conditions under which equivalent may be used. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.20-Plan submittal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.20-1 Plans for approval. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.20-3 Plans for information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.20-5 Self-certification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 62.25-General Requirements for All Automated Vital Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-1 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-5 All control systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-10 Manual alternate control systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-15 Safety control systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-20 Instrumentation, alarms, and centralized stations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-25 Programable systems and devices. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.25-30 Environmental design standards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 62.30-Reliability and Safety Criteria, All Automated VitalSystems </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.30-1 Failsafe. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.30-5 Independence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.30-10 Testing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart 62.35-Requirements for Specific Types of Automated Vital Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-1 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-5 Remote propulsion control systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-10 Flooding safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-15 Fire safety. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-20 Oil-fired main boilers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-35 Internal combustion engine starting systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-40 Fuel systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.35-50 Tabulated monitoring and safety control requirements forspecific systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart 62.50-Automated Self-propelled Vessel Manning </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.50-1 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.50-20 Additional requirements for minimally attended machineryplants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">62.50-30 Additional requirements for periodically unattended machineryplants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 8105; 49 CFR 1.46. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.01_General Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.01-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of this part is to make sure that the safety of a vessel withautomated vital systems, in maneuvering and all other sailing conditions,is equal to that of the vessel with the vital systems under direct manualoperator supervision. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.01-3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>(a) This part contains the minimum requirements for vessel automated vitalsystems. Specifically, this part contains_ (1) In subpart 62.25, the general requirements for all vital system automation;(2) In subpart 62.30, the criteria used to evaluate the designed reliabilityand safety of all automated vital systems; (3) In subpart 62.35, the minimum additional equipment, configuration,and functional requirements necessary when certain vital systems are automated;and (4) In subpart 62.50, the minimum additional requirements when automatedsystems are provided to replace specific personnel or to reduce overallcrew requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.01-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Vessels. </T3>This part applies to self-propelled vessels of 500 grosstons and over that are certificated under Subchapters D, I, or U and toself-propelled vessels of 100 gross tons and over that are certificatedunder Subchapter H. (b) <T3>Systems and Equipment. </T3>Except as noted in andSection;62.05-5(c),this part applies to automation of vital systems or equipment that_ (1) Is automatically controlled or monitored; (2) Is remotely controlled or monitored; or (3) Utilizes automation for the purpose of replacing specific personnelor to reduce overall crew requirements. (c) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>This part does not apply to the following systemsand equipment unless they are specifically addressed or unless their failurewould degrade the safety and reliability of the systems required by thispart: (1) Automatic auxiliary heating equipment (see part 63 of this subchapter).(2) Steering systems (see subparts 58.25 and 111.93 of this chapter). (3) Non-vital and industrial systems. (4) The communication and alarm systems in part 113 of this chapter. (d) <T3>Central control rooms. </T3>The requirements of subpart 62.50 onlyapply to vessels automated to replace specific personnel or to reduce overallcrew requirements, except where the main propulsion or ship service electricalgenerating plants are automatically or remotely controlled from a controlroom. In this case, andSection;62.50-20(a)(3) (except the provision in paragraph62.50-20(a)(3)(ii) relating to electrical power distribution), (b)(3),(c), (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(4), and (f)(2) apply, regardless of manning. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.05_Reference Specifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.05-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incorporation by reference. </ITAG>(a) Certain material is incorporated by reference into this part with theapproval of the Director of the Federal Register. To enforce any editionother than the one listed in paragraph (b) of this section, notice of thechange must be published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and the material made available to the public.All approved material is on file at the Office of the Federal Register,Washington, DC 20408 and at the Office of Marine Safety, Security, andEnvironmental Protection (G-MTH-2/12), Room 1218, U.S. Coast Guard HeadquartersBuilding, 2100 Second Street SW., Washington, DC 20593-0001. (b) The material approved for incorporation by reference in this part is:(1) Rules for Building and Classing Steel Vessels, 1986, issued by theAmerican Bureau of Shipping. This document is available from: AmericanBureau of Shipping, 45 Eisenhower Drive, Paramus, New Jersey 07653-0910.Sections affected by this incorporation by reference are: 62.25-1(c), 62.25-5(a),62.25-30(a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(5), 62.35-5(d), 62.35-35(a), 62.35-40(c),62.35-50, 62.50-30(c), and 62.50-30(k). <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.10_Terms Used </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.10-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>(a) For the purpose of this part: ``Alarm'' means an audible and visual indication of a hazardous or potentiallyhazardous condition that requires attention. ``Automated'' means the use of automatic or remote control, instrumentation,or alarms. ``Automatic control'' means self-regulating in attaining or carrying outan operator-specified equipment response or sequence. ``Boiler low-low water level'' is the minimum safe level in the boiler,in no case lower than that visible in the gage glass (see andSection;52.01-110of this chapter, Water Level Indicators). ``Engineering Control Center (ECC)'' means the centralized engineeringcontrol, monitoring, and communications location. ``Failsafe'' means that upon failure or malfunction of a component, subsystem,or system, the output automatically reverts to a pre-determined designstate of least critical consequence. Typical failsafe states are listedin Table 62.10-1(a). <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,s10,r10 </C><T4>Table </T4>62.10-1(a)_<T4>Typical Failsafe States </T4><H1>System or component </H1><H1>Preferred failsafe state </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Cooling water valve <D>As is or open. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Alarm system <D>Annunciate. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Safety system <D>Shut down, limited, or as is andamp; alarm. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Burner valve <D>Closed. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propulsion speed control <D>As is. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Feedwater valve <D>As is or open. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Controllable pitch propeller <D>As is. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Propulsion safety trip <D>As is andamp; alarm. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fuel tank valve <D>See andSection;56.50-60(d). </D></ITAG></ITAG> ``Flooding safety'' refers to flooding detection, watertight integrity,and dewatering systems. ``Independent'' refers to equipment arranged to perform its required functionregardless of the state of operation, or failure, of other equipment. ``Limit control'' means a function of an automatic control system to restrictoperation to a specified operating range or sequence without stopping themachinery. ``Local control'' means operator control from a location where the equipmentand its output can be directly manipulated and observed, e.g., at the switchboard,motor controller, propulsion engine, or other equipment. ``Manual control'' means operation by direct or power-assisted operatorintervention. ``Monitor'' means the use of direct observation, instrumentation, alarms,or a combination of these to determine equipment operation. ``Remote control'' means non-local automatic or manual control. ``Safety trip control system'' means a manually or automatically operatedsystem that rapidly shuts down another system or subsystem. ``System'' means a grouping or arrangement of elements that interact toperform a specific function and typically includes the following, as applicable:A fuel or power source. Power conversion elements. Control elements. Power transmission elements. Instrumentation. Safety control elements. Conditioning elements. ``Vital system or equipment'' is essential to the safety of the vessel,its passengers and crew. This typically includes, but is not limited to,the following: Fire detection, alarm, and extinguishing systems. Flooding safety systems. Ship service and emergency electrical generators, switchgear, and motorcontrol circuits serving vital electrical loads. The emergency equipment and systems listed in andSection;112.15 of this chapter.Propulsion systems, including those provided to meet andSection;58.01-35.Steering systems. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.15_Equivalents </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.15-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions under which equivalents may be used. </ITAG>(a) The Coast Guard accepts a substitute or alternate for the requirementsof this part if it provides an equivalent level of safety and reliability.Demonstration of functional equivalence must include comparison of a qualitativefailure analysis based on the requirements of this part with a comparableanalysis of the proposed substitute or alternate. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.20_Plan Submittal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.20-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plans for approval. </ITAG>(a) The following plans must be submitted to the Coast Guard for approvalin accordance with andSection;50.20-5 and andSection;50.20-10 of this chapter:(1) A general arrangement plan of control and monitoring equipment, controllocations, and the systems served. (2) Control and monitoring console, panel, and enclosure layouts. (3) Schematic or logic diagrams including functional relationships, a writtendescription of operation, and sequences of events for all modes of operation.(4) A description of control or monitoring system connections to non-vitalsystems. (5) A description of programable features. (6) A description of built-in test features and diagnostics. (7) Design Verification and Periodic Safety test procedures described insubpart 61.40 of this chapter. (8) Control system normal and emergency operating instructions. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.20-3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Plans for information. </ITAG>(a) One copy of the following plans must be submitted to the Officer inCharge, Marine Inspection, for use in the evaluation of automated systemsprovided to replace specific personnel or to reduce overall crew requirements:(1) Proposed manning, crew organization and utilization, including routinemaintenance, all operational evolutions, and emergencies. (2) A planned maintenance program for all vital systems. (b) One copy of a qualitative failure analysis must be submitted in accordancewith andSection;50.20-5 of this chapter for the following: (1) Propulsion controls. (2) Microprocessor-based system hardware. (3) Safety controls. (4) Automated electric power management. (5) Automation required to be independent that is not physically separate.(6) Any other automation that, in the judgement of the Commandant, potentiallyconstitutes a safety hazard to the vessel or personnel in case of failure.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_The qualitative failure analysis is intended to assist inevaluating the safety and reliability of the design. It should be conductedto a level of detail necessary to demonstrate compliance with applicablerequirements and should follow standard qualitative analysis procedures.Assumptions, operating conditions considered, failures considered, causeand effect relationships, how failures are detected by the crew, alternativesavailable to the crew, and possible design verification tests necessaryshould be included. Questions regarding failure analysis should be referredto the Marine Safety Center at an early stage of design. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.20-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Self-certification. </ITAG>(a) The designer or manufacturer of an automated system shall certify tothe Coast Guard, in writing, that the automation is designed to meet theenvironmental design standards of andSection;62.25-30. Plan review, shipboardtesting, or independent testing to these standards is not required. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Self-certification should normally accompany plan submittal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 62.25_General Requirements for All Automated Vital Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) Vital systems that are automatically or remotely controlled must beprovided with_ (1) An effective primary control system; (2) A manual alternate control system; (3) A safety control system, if required by andSection;62.25-15; (4) Instrumentation to monitor system parameters necessary for the safeand effective operation of the system; and (5) An alarm system if instrumentation is not continuously monitored oris inappropriate for detection of a failure or unsafe condition. (b) Automation systems or subsystems that control or monitor more thanone safety control, interlock, or operating sequence must perform all assignedtasks continuously, i.e., the detection of unsafe conditions must not preventcontrol or monitoring of other conditions. (c) Vital control and alarm system consoles and similar enclosures thatrely upon forced cooling for proper system operation must meet section41.23.2 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Building and ClassingSteel Vessels.'' <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">All control systems. </ITAG>(a) Controls for engines and turbines equipped with jacking or turninggear must meet section 41.21.4 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rulesfor Building and Classing Steel Vessels.'' (b) Automatic control systems must be stable over the entire range of normaloperation. (c) Inadvertent grounding of an electrical or electronic safety controlsystem must not cause safety control operation or safety control bypassing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manual alternate control systems. </ITAG>(a) Manual alternate control systems must_ (1) Be operable in an emergency and after a remote or automatic primarycontrol system failure; (2) Be suitable for manual control for prolonged periods; (3) Be readily accessible and operable; and (4) Include means to override automatic controls and interlocks, as applicable.(b) Permanent communications must be provided between primary remote controllocations and manual alternate control locations if operator attendanceis necessary to maintain safe alternate control. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Typically, this includes main boiler fronts and local propulsioncontrol. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safety control systems. </ITAG>(a) Minimum safety trip controls required for specific types of automatedvital systems are listed in Table 62.35-50. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Safety control systems include automatic and manual safetytrip controls and automatic safety limit controls. </ITAG>(b) Safety trip controls must not operate as a result of failure of thenormal electrical power source unless it is determined to be the failsafestate. (c) Automatic operation of a safety control must be alarmed in the machineryspaces and at the cognizant remote control location. (d) Local manual safety trip controls must be provided for all main boilers,turbines, and internal combustion engines. (e) Automatic safety trip control systems must_ (1) Be provided where there is an immediate danger that a failure willresult in serious damage, complete breakdown, fire, or explosion; (2) Require manual reset prior to renewed operation of the equipment; and(3) Not be provided if safety limit controls provide a safe alternativeand trip would result in loss of propulsion. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Instrumentation, alarms, and centralized stations. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Minimum instrumentation and alarms required for specifictypes of automated vital systems are listed in Table 62.35-50. (b) <T3>Instrumentation Location. </T3>(1) Manual control locations, includingremote manual control and manual alternate control, must be provided withthe instrumentation necessary for safe operation from that location. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Typically, instrumentation includes means to monitor theoutput of the monitored system. </ITAG>(2) Systems with remote instrumentation must have provisions for the installationof instrumentation at the monitored system equipment. (3) The status of automatically or remotely controlled vital auxiliaries,power sources, switches, and valves must be visually indicated in the machineryspaces or the cognizant remote control location, as applicable. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Status indicators include run, standby, off, open, closed,tripped, and on, as applicable. Status indicators at remote control locationsother than the ECC, if provided, may be summarized. Equipment normallyprovided with status indicators are addressed in Table 62.35-50 and Subparts58.01, 56.50, and 112.45. </ITAG>(4) Sequential interlocks provided in control systems to ensure safe operation,such as boiler programing control or reversing of propulsion diesels, musthave summary indicators in the machinery spaces and at the cognizant controllocation to show if the interlocks are satisfied. (5) Instrumentation listed in Table 62.35-50 must be of the continuousdisplay type or the demand display type. Displays must be in the ECC orin the machinery spaces if an ECC is not provided. (c) <T3>Instrumentation details. </T3>Demand instrumentation displays mustbe clearly readable and immediately available to the operator. (c) <T3>Alarms. </T3>(1) All alarms must clearly distinguish among_ (i) Normal, alarm, and acknowledged alarm conditions; and (ii) Fire, general alarm, CO<T2>2</T2>/halon, vital machinery, flooding, engineers' assistance-needed,and non-vital alarms. (2) Required alarms in high ambient noise areas must be supplemented byvisual means, such as rotating beacons, that are visible throughout theseareas. Red beacons must only be used for general or fire alarm purposes.(3) Automatic transfer to required backup or redundant systems or powersources must be alarmed in the machinery spaces. (4) Flooding safety, fire, loss of power, and engineers' assistance-neededalarms extended from the machinery spaces to a remote location must nothave a duty crewmember selector. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Other alarms may be provided with such a selector, providedthere is no off position. </ITAG>(5) Automation alarms must be separate and independent of the following:(i) The fire detection and alarm systems. (ii) The general alarm. (iii) CO<T2>2</T2>/halon release alarms. (6) Failure of an automatic control, remote control, or alarm system mustbe immediately alarmed in the machinery spaces and at the ECC, if provided.(e) <T3>Alarm details. </T3>(1) All alarms must_ (i) Have a manual acknowledgement device (No other means to reduce or eliminatethe annunciated signal may be provided except dimmers described in paragraph(g)(2) of this section); (ii) Be continuously powered; (iii) Be provided with a means to test audible and visual annunciators;(iv) Provide for normal equipment starting and operating transients andvessel motions, as applicable, without actuating the alarm; (v) Be able to simultaneously indicate more than one alarm condition, asapplicable; (vi) Visually annunciate until the alarm is manually acknowledged and thealarm condition is cleared; (vii) Audibly annunciate until manually acknowledged; (viii) Not prevent annunciation of subsequent alarms because of previousalarm acknowledgement; and (ix) Automatically reset to the normal operating condition only after thealarm has been manually acknowledged and the alarm condition is cleared.(2) Visual alarms must initially indicate the equipment or system malfunctionwithout operator intervention. (3) Power failure alarms must monitor on the load side of the last supplyprotective device. (f) <T3>Summarized and grouped alarms. </T3>Visual alarms at a control locationthat are summarized or grouped by function, system, or item of equipmentmust_ (1) Be sufficiently specific to allow any necessary action to be taken;and (2) Have a display at the equipment or an appropriate control locationto identify the specific alarm condition or location. (g) <T3>Central control locations. </T3>(1) Central control locations must_(i) Be arranged to allow the operator to safely and efficiently communicate,control, and monitor the vital systems under normal and emergency conditions,with a minimum of operator confusion and distraction; (ii) Be on a single deck level; and (iii) Co-locate control devices and instrumentation to allow visual assessmentof system response to control input. (2) Visual alarms and instruments on the navigating bridge must not interferewith the crew's vision. Dimmers must not eliminate visual indications.(3) Alarms and instrumentation at the main navigating bridge control locationmust be limited to those that require the attention or action of the officeron watch, are required by this chapter, or that would result in increasedsafety. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.25-25 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Programable systems and devices. </ITAG>(a) programable control or alarm system logic must not be altered afterDesign Verification testing without the approval of the cognizant Officerin Charge, Marine Inspection (OCMI). (See subpart 61.40 of this subchapter,Design Verification Tests). Safety control or automatic alarm systems mustbe provided with means, acceptable to the cognizant OCMI, to make suresetpoints remain within the safe operating range of the equipment. (b) Operating programs for microprocessor-based or computer-based vitalcontrol, alarm, and monitoring systems must be stored in non-volatile memoryand automatically operate on supply power resumption. (c) If a microprocessor-based or computer-based system serves both vitaland non-vital systems, hardware and software priorities must favor thevital systems. (d) At least one copy of all required manuals, records, and instructionsfor automatic or remote control or monitoring systems required to be abroadthe vessel must not be stored in electronic or magnetic memory.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.25-30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental design standards.</ITAG>(a) All automation must be suitable for the marine environment and mustbe designed and constructed to operate indefinitely under the followingconditions:(1) Ship motion and vibration described in Section 41.37 of the AmericanBureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Building and Classing Steel Vessels.''<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Inclination requirements for fire and flooding safety systemsare described in andSection; 112.05-5(c) of this chapter.</ITAG>(2) Ambient air temperatures described in Section 41.29.1 and 41.29.2 ofthe American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Building and Classing SteelVessels.''(3) Electrical voltage and frequency tolerances described in Section 41.29.3of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Building and ClassingSteel Vessels.''(4) Relative humidity of 0 to 95% at  45 anddegrees;C.(5) Hydraulic and pneumatic pressure variations described in Section 41.39.3eof the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Building and ClassingSteel Vessels.''<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Considerations should include normal dynamic conditionsthat might exceed these values, such as switching, valve closure, powersupply transfer, starting, and shutdown.</ITAG>(b) Low voltage electronics must be designed with due consideration forstatic discharge, electromagnetic interference, voltage transients, fungalgrowth, and contact corrosion.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 62.30_Reliability and Safety Criteria, All Automated VitalSystems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.30-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failsafe.</ITAG>(a) The failsafe state must be evaluated for each subsystem, system, orvessel to determine the least critical consequence.(b) All automatic control, remote control, safety control, and alarm systemsmust be failsafe.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.30-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independence.</ITAG>(a) Single non-concurrent failures in control, alarm, or instrumentationsystems, and their logical consequences, must not prevent sustained orrestored operation of any vital system or systems.(b)(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3) of this section,primary control, alternate control, safety control, and alarm and instrumentationsystems for any vital system must be independent of each other.(b)(2) Independent sensors are not required except that sensors for primaryspeed, pitch, or direction of rotation control in closed loop propulsioncontrol systems must be independent and physically separate from requiredsafety control, alarm, or instrumentation sensors.(b)(3) The safety trip control of andSection; 62.35_5(b)(2) must be independentand physically separate from all other systems.(c) Two independent sources of power must be provided for all primary control,safety control, instrumentation and alarm systems. Failure of the normalsource of power must actuate an alarm in the machinery spaces. One sourcemust be from the emergency power source (see part 112 of this chapter,Emergency Lighting and Power Systems) unless one of the sources is_(1) Derived from the power supply of the system being controlled or monitored;(2) A power take-off of that system; of(3) An independent power source equivalent to the emergency power source.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.30-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Testing.</ITAG>(a) Automated vital systems must be tested in accordance with subpart 61.40of this chapter.(b) On-line built-in test equipment must not lock out or override safetytrip control systems. This equipment must indicate when it is active.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart 62.35_Requirements for Specific Types of Automated Vital Systems</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) Minimum instrumentation, alarms, and safety controls required for specifictypes of automated vital systems are listed in Table 62.35-50.(b) Automatic propulsion systems, automated electric power management systems,and all associated subsystems and equipment must be capable of meetingload demands from standby to full system rated load, under steady stateand maneuvering conditions, without need for manual adjustment or manipulation.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Remote propulsion control systems.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Manual propulsion control. </T3>All vessels having remote propulsioncontrol from the navigating bridge, an ECC or maneuvering platform, orelsewhere must have a manual alternate propulsion control located at theequipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Separate local control locations may be provided for eachindependent propeller.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Centralized propulsion control equipment. </T3>Navigating bridge, ECC,maneuvering platform, and manual alternate control locations must include_(1) Control of the speed and direction of thrust for each independent propellercontrolled;(2) A guarded manually actuated safety trip control (which stops the propellingmachinery) for each independent propeller controlled;(3) Shaft speed and thrust direction indicators for each independent propellercontrolled;(4) The means to pass propulsion orders required by andSection; 113.30-5and andSection; 113.35-3 of this chapter; and(5) The means required by paragraph (e) of this section to achieve controllocation transfer and independence.(c) <T3>Main navigating bridge propulsion control. </T3>(1) Navigating bridgeremote propulsion control must be performed by a single control devicefor each independent propeller. Control must include automatic performanceof all associated services, and must not permit rate of movement of thecontrol device to overload the propulsion machinery.(2) On vessels propelled by steam turbines, the navigation bridge primarycontrol system must include safety limit controls for high and low boilerwater levels and low steam pressure. Actuation of these limits must bealarmed on the navigating bridge and at the maneuvering platform or ECC.(3) On vessels propelled by internal combustion engines, an alarm mustannunciate on the navigating bridge and at the maneuvering platform orECC, if provided, to indicate starting capability less then 50% of thatrequired by andSection; 62.35-35(a). If the primary remote control systemprovides automatic starting, the number of automatic consecutive attemptsthat fail to produce a start must be limited to reserve 50% of the requiredstarting capability.(d) <T3>Control location transfer. </T3>Control location transfer must meetSections 41.19.3 and 41.19.4 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rulesfor Building and Classing Steel Vessels.'' Manual alternate propulsioncontrol locations must be capable of overriding and operating independentof all remote and automatic control locations.(e) <T3>Control system details. </T3>(1) Each operator control device musthave a detent at the zero thrust position.(2) Propulsion machinery automatic safety trip control operation must onlyoccur when continued operation could result in serious damage, completebreakdown, or explosion of the equipment. Other than the overrides mentionedin andSection; 62.25-10(a)(4) and temporary overrides located at the mainnavigating bridge control location, overrides of these safety trip controlsare prohibited. Operation of permitted overrides must be alarmed at thenavigating bridge and at the maneuvering platform or ECC, as applicable,and must be guarded against inadvertent operation.(3) Remote propulsion control systems must be failsafe by maintaining thepreset (as is) speed and direction of thrust until local manual or alternatemanual control is in operation, or the manual safety trip control operates.Failure must activate alarms on the navigating bridge and in the machineryspaces.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Flooding safety.</ITAG>(a) Automatic bilge pumps must_(1) Be provided with bilge high level alarms that annunciate in the machineryspaces and at a manned control location and are independent of the pumpcontrols;(2) Be monitored to detect excessive operation in a specified time period;and(3) Meet all applicable pollution control requirements.(b) Remote controls for flooding safety equipment must remain functionalunder flooding conditions to the extent required for the associated equipmentby andSection; 56.50-50 and andSection; 56.50-95 of this chapter.(c) Remote bilge level sensors, where provided, must be located to detectflooding at an early stage and to provide redundant coverage.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fire safety.</ITAG>(a) All required fire pump remote control locations must include the controlsnecessary to charge the firemain and_(1) A firemain pressure indicator; or(2) A firemain low pressure alarm.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Oil-fired main boilers.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) All main boilers, regardless of intended mode ofoperation, must be provided with the automatic safety trip control system(s)of paragraphs (h)(1), (h)(2)(i), (h)(2) (ii), and (i) of this section toprevent unsafe conditions after light off.(2) Manual alternate control of boilers must be located at the boiler front.(3) A fully automatic main boiler must include_(i) Automatic combustion control;(ii) Programing control;(iii) Automatic feedwater control;(iv) Safety controls; and(v) An alarm system.(4) Following system line-up and starting of auxiliaries, fully automaticmain boilers must only require the operator to initiate the following sequences:(i) Boiler pre-purge.(ii) Trial for ignition of burners subsequent to successful initial burnerlight-off.(iii) Normal shutdown.(iv) Manual safety trip control operation.(v) Adjustment of primary control setpoints.(5) All requirements for programing control subsystems and safety controlsystems must be met when a boiler_(i) Automatically sequences burners;(ii) Is operated from a location remote from the boiler front; or(iii) Is fully automatic.(6) Where light oil pilots are used, the programing control and burnersafety trip controls must be provided for the light oil system. Trial forignition must not exceed 15 seconds and the main burner trial for ignitionmust not proceed until the pilot flame is proven.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Light oil is defined in andSection; 63.05-75(a) of this chapter.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Feedwater control. </T3>Automatic feedwater control subsystems mustsense, at a minimum, boiler water level and steam flow.(c) <T3>Combustion control. </T3>Automatic combustion control subsystems mustprovide_(1) An air/fuel ratio which ensures complete combustion and stable flamewith the fuel in use, under light off, steady state, and transient conditions;and(2) Stable boiler steam pressure and outlet temperatures under steady stateand transient load conditions; and(3) A low fire interlock to prevent high firing rates and superheater damageduring boiler warm up.(d) <T3>Programing control. </T3>The programing control must provide a programedsequence of interlocks for the safe ignition and normal shutdown of theboiler burners. The programing control must prevent ignition if unsafeconditions exist and must include the following minimum sequence of eventsand interlocks:(1) <T3>Prepurge. </T3>Boilers must undergo a continuous purge of the combustionchamber and convecting spaces to make sure of a minimum of 5 changes ofair. The purge must not be less than 15 seconds in duration, and must occurimmediately prior to the trial for ignition of the initial burner of aboiler. All registers and dampers must be open and an air flow of at least25 percent of the full load volumetric air flow must be proven before thepurge period commences. The prepurge must be complete before trial forignition of the initial burner.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>A pre-purge is not required immediately after a completepost-purge.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Trial for ignition and ignition. </T3>(i) Only one burner per boileris to be in trial for ignition at any time.(ii) Total boiler air flow during light off must be sufficient to preventpocketing and explosive accumulations of combustible gases.(iii) The burner igniter must be in position and proven energized beforeadmission of fuel to the boiler. The igniter must remain energized untilthe burner flame is established and stable, or until the trial for ignitionperiod ends.(iv) The trial for ignition period must be as short as practical for thespecific installation, but must not exceed 15 seconds.(v) Failure of the burner to ignite during a trial for ignition must automaticallyactuate the burner safety trip controls.(3) <T3>Post-purge. </T3>(i) Immediately after normal shutdown of the boiler,an automatic purge of the boiler equal to the volume and duration of theprepurge must occur.(ii) Following boiler safety trip control operation, the air flow to theboiler must not automatically increase. Post purge in such cases must beunder manual control.(e) <T3>Burner fuel oil valves. </T3>Each burner must be provided with a valvethat is_(1) Automatically closed by the burner or boiler safety trip control system;and(2) Operated by the programming control or combustion control subsystems,as applicable.(f) <T3>Master fuel oil valves. </T3>Each boiler must be provided with a masterfuel oil valve to stop fuel to the boiler automatically upon actuationby the boiler safety trip control system.(g) <T3>Valve closure time. </T3>The valves described in paragraphs (e) and(f) of this section must close within 4 seconds of automatic detectionof unsafe trip conditions.(h) <T3>Burner safety trip control system. </T3>(1) Each burner must be providedwith at least one flame detector.(2) The burner valve must automatically close when_(i) Loss of burner flame occurs;(ii) Actuated by the boiler safety trip control system;(iii) The burner is not properly seated or in place; or(iv) Trial for ignition fails, if a programing control is provided.(i) <T3>Boiler safety trip control system. </T3>(1) Each boiler must be providedwith a safety trip control system that automatically closes the masterand all burner fuel oil valves upon_(i) Boiler low-low water level;(ii) Inadequate boiler air flow to support complete combustion;(iii) Loss of boiler control power;(iv) Manual safety trip operation; or(v) Loss of flame at all burners.(2) The low-low water level safety trip control must account for normalvessel motions and operating transients.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Internal combustion engine starting systems.</ITAG>(a) The starting system for propulsion engines and ship service generatorprime movers required to automatically start must meet Sections 34.23.3,34.37.2, and 34.39 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Buildingand Classing Steel Vessels,'' except the sections referenced therein.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fuel systems.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Level alarms. </T3>Where high or low fuel tank level alarms are required,they must be located to allow the operator adequate time to prevent anunsafe condition.(b) <T3>Coal fuels. </T3>(1) Controls and instrumentation for coal systemsrequire special consideration by the Commandant (G-MTH).(2) Interlocks must be provided to ensure a safe transfer of machineryoperation from one fuel to another.(c) <T3>Automatic fuel heating. </T3>Automatic fuel heating arrangements mustmeet Section 41.78.1 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Buildingand Classing Steel Vessels.''(d) <T3>Overflow prevention. </T3>Fuel oil day tanks, settlers, and similarfuel oil service tanks that are filled automatically or by remote controlmust be provided with a high level alarm that annunciates in the machineryspaces and either an automatic safety trip control or an overflow arrangement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.35-50 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Tabulated monitoring and safety control requirements for specificsystems.</ITAG>(a) The minimum instrumentation, alarms, and safety controls required forspecific types of systems are listed in Table 62.35-50.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table</T4> 62.35-50_<T4>Minimum System Monitoring and Safety Control Requirements for SpecificSystems(\1\)</T4><H1>System</H1><H1>Service</H1><H1>Instrumentation</H1><H1>Alarm</H1><H1>Safety control</H1><H1>Notes</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Main (Propulsion) boiler <D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D><D> </D><D>(</D>2, 3) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Supply casing and uptakes </D><D> </D><D>Fire </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Burner flame </D><D>Status </D><D>Failure </D><D>Burner auto trip </D><D>(\3\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Burner seating </D><D> </D><D>Failure </D><D>......do </D><D>(\3\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Trial for ignition </D><D>Status </D><D>Failure </D><D>......do </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Control power </D><D>Available (pressure) </D><D>Failure (low) </D><D>......do </D><D>(\3\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>Manual trip </D><D>(\3\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Burner valve </D><D>Open/closed </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Low fire interlock </D><D>Status </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Program control interlock </D><D>Status </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Main (Propulsion steam) turbine <D>(\2\) </D><D>(\2\) </D><D>(\2\) </D><D> </D><D>(</D>4, 5) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>Manual trip </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Main propulsion, diesel <D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D><D> </D><D>(</D>4, 5) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>Manual trip </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Main propulsion, remote control <D> </D><D> </D><D>Failure </D><D>......do </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Auto safety trip override </D><D> </D><D>Activated </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Starting power </D><D>Pressure (voltage) </D><D>Low </D><D>Limit </D><D>(\2\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Location in control </D><D>Status </D><D>Override </D><D> </D><D>(\6\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Shaft speed/direction/pitch </D><D>(\3\) </D><D>(\3\) </D><D>(\3\) </D><D>(\3\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Clutch fluid </D><D>Pressure </D><D>Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Main propulsion, electric <D>(\4\) </D><D>(\4\) </D><D>(\4\) </D><D>(\4\) </D><D>(\7\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Main propulsion, shafting <D>Stern tube oil tank level </D><D> </D><D>Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Line shaft bearing </D><D>Temperature, forced lubrication </D><D>High </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D>Pressure </D><D>Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Main propulsion, controllable pitch propeller <D>Hydraulic oil </D><D>Pressure </D><D>High, Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D>Temperature </D><D>High </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Generators <D>Ship service </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D>Starting pressure/voltage </D><D>Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D>Tripped </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Emergency </D><D>(\5\) </D><D>(\5\) </D><D>(\5\) </D><D>(\5\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Turbogenerator </D><D>(</D>1, 6) <D>(</D>1, 6) <D>(\6\)</D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>Manual trip </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Diesel </D><D>(</D>1, 7) <D>(</D>1, 7) <D>(\7\) </D><D>(\5\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>Manual trip </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Auxiliary boiler <D> </D><D>Run </D><D>Trip </D><D> </D><D>(\1\\2\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Gas turbine <D>(\8\) </D><D>(\8\) </D><D>(\8\) </D><D>(\8\) </D><D>(\5\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Engines and turbines <D>Jacking/turning gear </D><D>Engaged </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>(\8\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fuel oil <D>(\9\) </D><D>(\9\) </D><D>(\9\) </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Remote/auto fill level </D><D> </D><D>High </D><D>Auto trip or overflow arrangement </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Hi. press. leakage level </D><D> </D><D>High </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Bilge <D>Pump remote control </D><D>Run </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Pump auto control </D><D>Run </D><D>Excessive operations </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Level </D><D> </D><D>High/location </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Machinery space CL.3 W.T. doors <D> </D><D>Open/closed </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire detection <D>Machinery spaces </D><D> </D><D>Space on fire </D><D> </D><D>(\9\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fire main <D> </D><D>Pressure </D><D>Low </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Personnel <D>Deadman </D><D> </D><D>Fail to acknowledge </D><D> </D><D>(\10\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General, control and alarm systems <D>Power supply </D><D>Available (pressure) </D><D>Failure (low) </D><D> </D><D>  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>System function </D><D> </D><D>Failure </D><D> </D><D>(\11\) </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Console air conditioning </D><D> </D><D>Failure </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Built in test equipment </D><D>Active </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Sequential interlock </D><D>Activated </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D>Safety control </D><D> </D><D>Activated </D><D>Auto trip/limit </D><D>(\11\) </D><ITAG tagnum="1">Redundant auxiliary, system, power supply <D> </D><D>Status </D><D>Auto transfer </D><D> </D><D> </D><F>\1\See ABS Table 41.1. </F><F>\2\See ABS Table 41.1, except Shaft Roller. </F><F>\3\See andSection;113.37 of this chapter. </F><F>\4\See subparts 111.33 and 111.35 of this chapter. </F><F>\5\See subparts 112.45 and 112.50 of this chapter. </F><F>\6\See andSection;111.12-1(c) of this chapter. </F><F>\7\See andSection;111.12-1 (b), (c) of this chapter. </F><F>\8\See andSection;58.10-15(g) of this chapter. </F><F>\9\See ABS Table 41.1, ``Additional Services.''</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Notes on Table 62.35-50: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The monitoring and controls listed in this table are applicableif the system listed is provided or required. References to ABS Table 41.1apply to the ``Operation,'' ``Display,'' ``Alarm,'' and ``Notes'' 1 through12, except the reference to ACCU in Note 11. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Safety limit controls must be provided in navigating bridge primarypropulsion control systems. See andSection;62.35-5(c). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Safety trip controls and alarms must be provided for all main boilers,regardless of mode of operation. See andSection;62.35-20(a). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Loss of forced lubrication safety trip controls must be provided,as applicable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Override of overspeed and loss of forced lubrication pressure safetytrip controls must not be provided. See andSection;62.35-5(e)(2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Transfer interlocks must be provided. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Semiconductor controlled rectifiers must have current limit controls.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Interlocks must be provided. See andSection;62.25-5(a). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. See subparts 113.10, 161.002, and fire protection requirementsof the applicable subchapters. The use of thermal detectors alone is subjectto special consideration by the Commandant (G-MTH). Flame detectors mayonly be used in conjunction with smoke or heat detectors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. See andSection;62.50-20(b)(1). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Alarms and controls must be failsafe. See andSection;62.30-1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Vital auxiliary boilers only. Also see Part 63. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 62.50_Automated Self-propelled Vessel Manning </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.50-1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) Where automated systems are provided to replace specific personnelin the control and observation of the engineering plant and spaces, orreduce overall crew requirements, the arrangements must make sure thatunder all sailing conditions, including maneuvering, the safety of thevessel is equal to that of the same vessel with the entire plant underfully attended direct manual supervision. (b) Coast Guard acceptance of automated systems to replace specific personnelor to reduce overall crew requirements is predicated upon_ (1) The capabilities of the automated systems; (2) The combination of the personnel, equipment, and systems necessaryto ensure the safety of the vessel, personnel, and environment in all sailingconditions, including maneuvering; (3) The ability of the crew to perform all operational evolutions, includingemergencies such as fire or control or monitoring system failure; (4) A planned maintenance program including routine maintenance, inspection,and testing to ensure the continued safe operation of the vessel; and (5) The automated system's demonstrated reliability during an initial trialperiod, and its continuing reliability.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The cognizant Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, (OCMI)also determines the need for more or less equipment depending on the vesselcharacteristics, route, or trade.</ITAG>(c) Equipment provided to replace specific personnel or to reduce overallcrew requirements that proves unsafe or unreliable in the judgment of thecognizant Officer in Charge, Marine Inspection, must be immediately replacedor repaired or vessel manning will be modified to compensate for the equipmentinadequacy. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;62.50-20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional requirements for minimally attended machinery plants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Minimally attended machinery plants include vessel machineryplants and spaces that are automated, but not to a degree where the plantcould be left unattended. Emphasis is placed on the centralized remotecontrol and monitoring of the machinery plant and machinery spaces.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) Navigating bridge propulsion control must be provided.(2) An ECC must be provided and must include the automatic and remote controland monitoring systems necessary to limit the operator's activity to monitoringthe plant, initiating programed control system sequences, and taking appropriateaction in an emergency. (3) The ECC must include control and monitoring of all vital engineeringsystems, including_ (i) The propulsion plant and its auxiliaries; (ii) Electrical power generation and distribution; (iii) Machinery space fire detection, alarm, and extinguishing systems;and (iv) Machinery space flooding safety systems. (4) ECC control of vital systems must include the ability to place requiredstandby systems, auxiliaries, and power sources in operation, unless automatictransfer is provided, and to shut down such equipment when necessary.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>ECC remote control need not include means for a single operatorto bring the plant to standby from a cold plant or dead ship conditionor controls for non-vital systems or equipment.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Alarms and instrumentation.</T3> (1) A personnel alarm must be providedand must annunciate on the bridge if not routinely acknowledged at theECC or in the machinery spaces. (2) Continuous or demand instrumentation displays must be provided at theECC to meet the system and equipment monitoring requirements of this partif the ECC is to be continuously attended. If the watchstander's normalactivities include maintenance, a roving watch, or similar activities inthe machinery spaces but not at the ECC, both alarms and instrumentationmust be provided. (3) All required audible alarms must annunciate throughout the ECC andmachinery spaces. (c) <T3>Fire detection and alarms. </T3>An approved automatic fire detectionand alarm system must be provided to monitor all machinery spaces. Thesystem must activate all alarms at the ECC, the navigating bridge, andthroughout the machinery spaces and engineers' accommodations. The ECCand bridge alarms must visually indicate which machinery space is on fire,as applicable.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>For purposes of this part, the specific location of firesthat are not in machniery spaces need not be indicated.</ITAG>(d) <T3>Fire pumps. </T3>(1) The ECC must include control of the main machineryspace fire pumps. (2) Remote control of a required fire pump must be provided from the navigatingbridge. Where one or more fire pumps is required to be independent of themain machinery space, at least one such pump must be controlled from thenavigating bridge. (e) <T3>Flooding safety. </T3>(1) Machinery space bilges, bilge wells, shaftalley bilges, and other minimally attended locations where liquids mightaccumulate must be monitored from the ECC to detect flooding angles fromvertical of up to 15anddegrees; heel and 5anddegrees; trim. (2) ECC must include the controls necessary to bring at least one of thebilge pumps required by subpart 56.50 of this chapter into operation tocounter flooding in the locations listed in paragraph (e)(1). (3) Where watertight doors in subdivision bulkheads are required in themachinery spaces, they must be Class 3 watertight doors and must be controllablefrom the ECC and the required navigating bridge control location.(4) Controls must be provided to operate the sea inlet and discharge valvesrequired by andSection; 56.50-95(d) of this chapter and the emergency bilgesuction required by andSection; 56.50-50(f). These controls must be arrangedto allow time for operation in the event of flooding with the vessel inthe fully loaded condition. Time considerations must include detection,crew response, and control operation time.(f) <T3>Communications.</T3> (1) A means must be provided at the ECC to selectivelysummon any engineering department member from the engineering accommodationsto the ECC.(2) The voice communications system required by andSection; 113.30-5(a) ofthis chapter must also include the engineering officers' accommodations.(g) <T3>Electrical systems.</T3> (1) The ECC must include the controls andinstrumentation necessary to place the ship service and propulsion generatorsin service in 30 seconds.(2) The main distribution and propulsion switchboards and generator controlsmust either be located at the ECC, if the ECC is within the bounaries ofthe main machinery space, or the controls and instrumentation requiredby Part 111 of this chapter must be duplicated at the ECC. Controls atthe switchboard must be able to override those at the ECC, if separate.Also see andSection; 111.12-11(g) and andSection; 111.30-1(a)(4) regardingswitchboard location.(g) <T3>Maintenance program.</T3> (1) The vessel must have a planned maintenanceprogram to ensure continued safe operation of all vital systems. Programcontent and detail is optional, but must include maintenance and repairmanuals for work to be accomplished by maintenance personnel and checkofflists for routine inspection and maintenance procedures.(2) The planned maintenance program must be functioning prior to the completionof the evaluation period for reduced manning required by andSection; 62.50-1(b)(5).(3) Maintenance and repair manuals must include details as to what, when,and how to troubleshoot, repair and test the installed equipment and whatparts are necessary to accomplish the procedures. Schematic and logic diagramsrequired by andSection; 62.20-1 of this part must be included in this documentation.Manuals must clearly delineate information that is not applicable to theinstalled equipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 62.50-30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional requirements for periodically unattended machinery plants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4> Periodically unattended machinery plants include machineryplants and spaces that are automated to the degree that they are self-regulatingand self-monitoring and could safely be left periodically unattended. Emphasisis placed on providing systems that act automatically until the crew cantake action in the event of a failure or emergency. Requirements are inaddition to those of a minimally attended machinery plant.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> The requirements of this section must be met in additionto these of andSection; 62.50-20 of this part.(b) <T3>Automatic transfer.</T3> Redundant vital auxiliaries and power sourcesmust automatically transfer to the backup units upon failure of operatingunits.(c) <T3>Fuel systems.</T3> The fuel service and treatment system(s) must meetSection 41.77.1 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rules for Buildingand Classing Steel Vessels.''(d) <T3>Starting systems.</T3> Automatic or remote starting system receivers,accumulators, and batteries must be automatically and continuously charged.(e) <T3>Assistance-needed alarm.</T3> The engineer's assistance-needed alarm(see subpart 113.27 of this chapter) must annunciate if_(1) An alarm at the ECC is not acknowledged in the period of time necessaryfor an engineer to respond at the ECC from the machinery spaces or engineers'accommodations; or(2) An ECC alarm system normal power supply fails.(f) <T3>Remote alarms.</T3> ECC alarms for vital systems that require the immediateattention of the bridge watch officer for the safe navigation of the vesselmust be extended to the bridge. All ECC alarms required by this part mustbe extended to the engineers' accommodations. Other than fire or floodingalarms, this may be accomplished by summarized visual alarm displays.(g) <T3>ECC alarms.</T3> All requirements of this part for system or equipmentmonitoring must be met by providing both displays and alarms at the ECC.(h) <T3>Fire control station.</T3> A control station for fire protection ofthe machinery spaces must be provided outside the machinery spaces. Atleast one access to this station must be independent of category A machineryspaces, and any boundary shared with these spaces must have an A-60 fireclassification as defined in andSection; 72.05 of this chapter. Except wheresuch an arrangement is not possible, control and monitoring cables andpiping for the station must not adjoin or penetrate the boundaries of acategory A machinery space, uptakes, or casings. The fire control stationmust include_(1) Annunciation of which machinery space is on fire;(2) Control of a fire pump required by this chapter to be independent ofthe main machinery spaces;(3) Controls for machinery space fixed gas fire extinguishing systems;(4) Control of oil piping positive shutoff valves located in the machineryspaces and required by andSection; 56.50-60(d);(5) Controls for machinery space fire door holding and release systems,skylights and similar openings;(6) The remote stopping systems for the machinery listed in andSection; 111.103of this chapter; and(7) Voice communications with the bridge.(i) <T3>Oil leakage.</T3> Leakages from high pressure fuel oil pipes must becollected and high levels must be alarmed at the ECC.(j) <T3>Maintenance program.</T3> The maintenance program of andSection; 62.50-20(h)must include a checkoff list to make sure that routine daily maintenancehas been performed, fire and flooding hazards have been minimized, andplant status is suitable for unattended operation. Completion of this checkofflist must be logged before leaving the plant unattended.(k) <T3>Continuity of electrical power.</T3> The electrical plant must meetSections 41.75.1 and 41.75.3 of the American Bureau of Shipping's ``Rulesfor Building and Classing Steel Vessels'' and must_(1) Not use the emergency generator for this purpose;(2) Restore power in not more than 30 seconds; and(3) Account for loads permitted by andSection; 111.70-3(f) of this chapterto automatically restart.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 110_GENERAL PROVISIONS</ITAG>12. The authority citation for Part 110 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 4104; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>13. In andSection; 110.25-1, by removing the existing paragraphs (i) and(j) and renumbering the existing paragraphs (k) through (p) as (i) through(n), respectively.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 111_ELECTRIC SYSTEMS_GENERAL REQUIREMENT</ITAG>14. The authority citation for Part 111 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 4104; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>15. In Subpart 111.01, andSection; 111.01-9 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 111.01-9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Watertight, waterproof, and dripproof equipment.</ITAG>(a) Electric equipment exposed to the weather or located in a space whereit is exposed to seas, splashing, or similar moisture conditions must bewatertight or be in a watertight enclosure, except a motor, which mustbe either watertight or waterproof. A watertight enclosure must be designedin such a way that the total rated temperature of the equipment insidethe enclosure is not exceeded.(b) Central control consoles and similar control enclosures must be dripproof,regardless of location.16. In andSection; 111.12-11, a new paragraph (j) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 111.12-11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Generator protection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) <T3>Circuit breaker reclosing.</T3> Generator circuit breakers must notautomatically close after tripping.17. In Subpart 111.54, a new andSection; 111.54-3 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 111.54-3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Remote control.</ITAG>Remotely controlled circuit breakers must have local manual means of operation.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 113_COMMUNICATION AND ALARM SYSTEMS AND EQUIPMENT</ITAG>18. The authority citation for Part 113 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 46 U.S.C. 3306, 3703, 4104; 49 CFR 1.46.</ITAG>19. In 113.35-3, a new paragraph (f) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 113.35-3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) Engine order telegraph and remote propulsion control systems must beelectrically separate and independent, except that a single mechanicaloperator control device with separate transmitters and connections foreach system may be used.<ITAG tagnum="21">April 1, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">P.C. Lauridsen,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Captain, U.S. Coast Guard, Acting Chief, Office of Marine Safety, Securityand Environmental Protection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-10622 Filed 5-17-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-14-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>